70 This standard includes selected environmental exposure tests for hardware  operating in earth orbit.  The tests included are generally regarded as the most critical and the  ones having the highest cost and schedule impact.  This standard also includes functional  demonstration tests necessary to verify the capability of the hardware to perform its intended  function (with and without environmental exposure as appropriate).  This standard specifies test  levels, factors, margins, durations, and other parameters where appropriate.  In some cases,  these specifics are expressed statistically or are referenced in other NASA standards.     1.2 Purpose.  This standard provides a NASA-wide common basis from which test  programs shall be developed for NASA payloads.  The document defines a standard set of flight  hardware test requirements, which provide the necessary verification of design adequacy and  flight worthiness of NASA spacecraft.  Compliance provides consistency across the Agency and  its contractors, facilitating the sharing of hardware between Centers and programs.  Compliance  also provides a basis for establishing a baseline pedigree for the "qualification by similarity"  evaluation process for "heritage" hardware without the need to consider the variability of test  requirements.     1.3 Applicability.  This standard recommends engineering practices for NASA programs  and projects.  This standard may be cited in contracts and program documents as a technical  requirement or as a reference for guidance.  Determining the suitability of this standard and its  provisions is the responsibility of program/project management and the performing organization.   Subject to approval by the assigned Technical Authority, individual provisions of this standard  may be tailored (i.e., modified or deleted) by contract or program specifications to meet specific  program/project needs and constraints.    This standard applies to all NASA payload hardware developed in-house or under contract that  is launched on expendable or reusable launch vehicles (both free-flyer and attached payloads).  The levels of assembly for which the standard applies are the payload, modular subsystem  (which includes large instruments), and component levels.  Small instruments may be treated as  components.  This standard excludes payloads launched on sounding rockets, balloons, and  aircraft, as well as the launch vehicle hardware itself.  This standard is developed for the typical  NASA protoflight payload wherein one payload is built and serves to qualify the design and is  also the flight article.  This standard recognizes the need to define the mission-unique  environment for each test discipline.  This environmental definition shall ensure the tailoring of  test requirements to the environmental envelope encountered during the payload’s total lifetime  considering phases such as ground handling, launch, and in-space operations.  The principal  objective of the test program is to demonstrate the system’s ability to collect scientific data and  perform specific remote operations, rather than meet rigid general requirements.  Certain  environments and functions cannot reasonably be simulated on earth because of factors such  as size, zero-gravity limitations, and interface boundary conditions.  Tailoring the test program,  with supplemental analysis, is appropriate in such cases.  When tailoring is utilized or when  deviations are deemed necessary, the project manager and the assigned Technical Authority  shall review and approve such tailoring and deviations and assure that a documented record,  including the rationale, is maintained.  This standard is generally not retroactive from the  approval date for hardware already under contract.       NASA-STD-7002A  September 10, 2004    2
60 This standard and its related handbook, NASA-HDBK-6003, Application of Data Matrix  Identification Symbols to Aerospace Parts Using Direct Part Marking Methods/Techniques, were  developed to provide NASA and its contractors with instructions to safely apply Data Matrix  identification symbols to aerospace parts using these new DPM methods and techniques.  Both  the standard and the handbook were created by representatives from the major automatic  identification and data capture (AI/DC) manufacturers, government, and aerospace user groups  under a collaborative agreement with NASA.  The standard has been approved for use by NASA  Headquarters for all field installations, and is intended to provide a common framework for  consistent practices across NASA programs.    Revision B of this standard includes updates stemming from the DoD/National Center of  Manufacturing Sciences (NCMS) Retrograde Part Marking Program as approved by the Assistant  Under Secretary of Defense, and the United States Coast Guard (USCG) Data Matrix Direct Part  Marking Flight Verification Program, which was sanctioned by the Flight Safety Critical Aircraft  Part Problem Action Team (FSCAP PAT) and U.S. Congress Aircraft Safety Committee.   Revision B planning had called for the incorporation of information resulting from the Materials- International Space Station-Experiment (MISSE), which exposed the Data Matrix Symbol  markings to low-earth orbit (LEO) environments.  However, due to delays in the retrieval of the  MISSE experiment, information related to marking processes certified for LEO are to be  incorporated into a later revision of this document.  MISSE program information is included in  Appendix A.      1.1 Purpose  This standard establishes uniform requirements for applying Data Matrix identification symbols  to parts used on NASA programs/projects using DPM methods and techniques.  Overall  program/project requirements related to the use of the Data Matrix symbol include:  symbol  criteria, marking method selection, marking surface preparation, marking location, protective  coatings, marking environments, and mark-quality verification standards.  This document does  not specifically address the marking of human-readable characters or temporary part  identification markings (bands, labels, or tags).  On new programs, human-readable characters  can be applied using the same marking methods defined in this standard.  Data Matrix symbols  can be added to parts used on existing programs if there is adequate area to accommodate the  mark and the structural integrity of the part is not compromised.     This standard is intended to provide general requirements for applying Data Matrix identification  symbols safely onto products using permanent DPM methods and techniques.  The standard  addresses symbol structure only as it relates to marking and reading limitations.  Technical  specifications related to the Data Matrix symbol are found in AIM International, Inc., technical     NASA-STD-6002B     7 of 66      specification titled “International Symbology Specification – Data Matrix.” Technical  information on how to apply the markings is addressed in NASA-HDBK-6003, Application of  Data Matrix Identification Symbols to Aerospace Parts Using Direct Part Marking  Methods/Techniques.     1.2 Applicability  This standard is applicable to NASA programs/projects using DPM methods and techniques.    This standard may be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a technical  requirement or as a reference for guidance.  Except where noted as mandatory, individual  provisions of this standard may be tailored (i.e., modified or deleted) by contract or program  specifications to meet specific program/project needs and constraints.  Tailoring must be  formally documented as part of program/project requirements and approved.    This standard recommends the use of Data Matrix symbol marking to support updates to  Automated Identification Technology (AIT) systems used to provide program managers with  real-time hardware status.  The standard provides engineering practices for NASA programs and  projects.  Human-readable markings applied to NASA aircraft maintained under Federal  Aviation Administration (FAA) certificate such as Part 121 or Part 135 shall comply with Title  14 of the Code of Federal Regulations.  Data Matrix marking are used to identify the following:     •   Calibration items  •   Critical fasteners  •   EEE parts  •   Fracture-critical parts  •   Hazard analysis items  •   Items requiring periodic maintenance  •   Limited-life items  •   Pilferage Items  •   Repair-limited items  •   Restricted-use items  •   Safety-critical Items  •   Temporary installations  •   Other items identified with paint dots or assigned date codes, lot numbers, member   numbers, or serial numbers for safety, reliability, maintainability or quality assurance purposes,  including items not currently serialized due to size limitations associated with the applications of  human- readable marking.      Environmental, health, and safety impacts in processes and materials shall be considered when  employing identification marking methods and techniques.  Alternative, "environmentally  friendly" materials, which contain low/no volatile organic compounds (VOCs), shall be  considered when determining the appropriate method/technique for each marking application.   Many types of ink contain VOCs, such as methyl ethyl ketone, xylene, and toluene, which are  principal components in atmospheric reactions that form ozone and other photochemical     NASA-STD-6002B     8 of 66      oxidants.  Exposures to VOC-containing materials have health impacts, which include eye and  respiratory irritation, headache, dizziness, memory impairment, neurotoxicity, and cancer.
50 This standard defines the methodologies, practices, and requirements for the conduct of load analyses for payloads and spacecraft.  1.2  Purpose.  This standard establishes general NASA policies for the definition of loads to be used in the design and development of payloads and spacecraft.  Guidelines are prescribed to establish consistent practices and facilitate integration at the project and program levels.  Payloads and spacecraft shall be designed to maintain structural integrity and the required degree of functionality to ensure successful operation during all phases of the expected life cycle.  Flight structures and systems shall consider static and dynamic load environments to be encountered during assembly, testing, transportation, launch, ascent, space operations, extraterrestrial operations, descent, and landing.  1.3  Applicability.  This standard recommends engineering practices for NASA programs and projects.  It may be cited in contracts and program documents as a technical requirement or as a reference for guidance.  Determining the suitability of this standard and its provisions is the responsibility of program/project management and the performing organization.  Individual provisions of this standard may be tailored (i.e., modified or deleted) by contract or program specifications to meet specific program/project needs and constraints.
50 The purpose of this document is to establish the fracture control requirements for all payload hardware to be launched or retrieved using the Space Shuttle. Meeting these requirements implements the minimum fracture control requirements of National Space Transportation System (NSTS) 1700.7, Safety Policy and Requirements for Payloads Using the Space Transportation System.  All payload fracture control shall be in accordance with the requirements stated herein.  1.2  General requirements.  For payloads using the Space Shuttle, NASA requires full assurance of system safety.  This is accomplished through good design, manufacturing, test, and operational practices, including the judicious choice of materials, detailed analysis, appropriate factors of safety, rigorous testing, control of hardware, and adequate inspection. For payloads carried on the Space Shuttle, it is specifically required that design shall be based on fracture control procedures when failure of structure can result in a catastrophic event. Because fracture control is a safety-critical issue, all deviations from the requirements in this document must be approved by the responsible program authority (i.e., the program director/project manager) and concurred with by the designated safety and fracture control authorities at the NASA Center or sponsoring institution (see 3, Definitions).  1.3  Applicability.  a. The requirements set forth in this document are the minimum fracture control requirements for all Space Shuttle payloads.  Any deviations from these requirements for Space Shuttle payloads shall be approved by the Space Shuttle Program.  b.  For applications other than payloads using the Space Shuttle, this standard may be tailored to meet specific application requirements, and it may be cited in contracts and program documents as a technical requirement or as a reference for guidance.  Determining the suitability of this standard and its provisions is the responsibility of program/project management and the performing organization.  Individual provisions of this standard may be tailored (i.e., modified or deleted) by contract or program specifications to meet specific program/project needs and constraints.  c.  This document contains the requirements for metallic and nonmetallic structural components.  Components that are exempt from fracture control are those that are clearly nonstructural and not susceptible to failure as a result of crack propagation (e.g., insulation blankets, electrical wire bundles, and elastomeric seals).  Some small mechanical parts such as bearings and valve seats have traditionally been developed and qualified through strong test programs and rigorous process control which demonstrate their reliability.  In the presence of these strong development programs, these type parts may be exempt from fracture control with the approval of the responsible fracture control authority.  d.  Individual NASA Centers or other payload-sponsoring organizations may establish more restrictive, project-specific requirements and/or guidelines as appropriate.  These additional requirements/guidelines shall be approved by the responsible program authority.    NASA-STD-5003 October 7, 1996  2  1.4  Other requirements.  Nothing in this document shall be construed as requiring the duplication of effort dictated by other contract provisions.  Conversely, provisions stated herein shall not be interpreted to preclude compliance with requirements invoked by other provisions.  1.5  Prerogatives of the Government.  All plans, data, and documentation generated under contract to NASA or its suppliers in fulfillment of these requirements are subject to examination, evaluation, and inspection by the procuring installation or its designated representatives.
60 This handbook establishes NASA program requirements for evaluation, testing, and selection of materials to preclude unsafe conditions related to flammability, odor, offgassing, and fluid compatibility. Materials intended for use in space vehicles, specified test facilities, and specified ground support equipment (GSE) must meet the requirements of this document. Additional materials performance requirements may be specified in other program or NASA center specific documentation. Responsible NASA centers materials organizations must include applicable requirements of this document in their materials control programs. Materials used in habitable areas of spacecraft, including the materials of the spacecraft, stowed equipment, and experiments, must be evaluated for flammability, odor, and offgassing characteristics. All materials used in other areas must be evaluated for flammability characteristics. In addition, materials that are exposed to liquid oxygen (LOX), gaseous oxygen (GOX), and other reactive fluids1 must be evaluated for compatibility with the fluid in their use application. Materials exposed to pressurized breathing gases also must be evaluated for odor and offgassing characteristics. The worst-case anticipated use environment (most hazardous pressure, temperature, material thickness, and fluid exposure conditions) must be used in the evaluation process. Materials that have been shown to meet the criteria of the required tests are acceptable for further consideration in design. Whenever possible, materials should be selected that have already been shown to meet the test criteria in the use environment. Existing test data are compiled in the NASA Marshall Space Flight Center (MSFC) Materials and Processes Technical Information System (MAPTIS) and published periodically as the latest revision of a joint document with Johnson Space Center (JSC), MSFC-HDBK-527/JSC 09604. MAPTIS can be accessed by computer datalink. Systems containing materials that have not been tested or do not meet the criteria of the required tests must be verified to be acceptable in the use configuration by analysis or testing. This verification rationale must be documented and submitted to the responsible NASA center materials organization for approval.
70 The term vibroacoustics is defined as an environment induced by high- intensity acoustic noise associated with various segments of the flight profile.  It manifests itself throughout the payload in the form of transmitted acoustic excitation and as structure- borne random vibration.  Therefore, the standard is to specifically address the acoustic and random vibration environments and test levels.  1.2  Purpose.  The primary objective of this standard is to establish a uniform usage of test factors in the vibroacoustic verification process for spaceflight payload hardware.  The standard provides test factors for verification of payload hardware for prototype, protoflight, and flight acceptance programs.  In addition, minimum workmanship test levels are included. With the exception of minimum workmanship test levels, the test levels are given in relation to the "maximum expected flight level” (MEFL).  Although the major emphasis of the standard is on test levels, the standard also covers the subjects of test duration, test control tolerances, data analysis, test tailoring, payload fill effects, and analysis methods.  1.3  Applicability.  This standard recommends engineering practices for NASA programs and projects.  It may be cited in contracts and program documents as a technical requirement or as a reference for guidance.  Determining the suitability of this standard and its provisions is the responsibility of program/project management and the performing organization.  Individual provisions of this standard may be tailored (i.e., modified or deleted) by contract or program specifications to meet specific program/project needs and constraints.  The standard applies only to spaceflight payload hardware.  Launch vehicles, payloads launched by sounding rockets, aircraft and balloons, and ground support equipment are excluded.  The levels of assembly for which the standard is applicable are the payload, subsystem, and component levels as specifically identified or as judged to be appropriate.  A payload is defined as an assemblage of subsystems designed to perform a specified mission in space; a subsystem is defined as a functional subdivision of a payload consisting of two or more components; and a component is defined as a functional subdivision of a subsystem and is generally a self-contained combination of items performing a function necessary for the subsystem's operation.  The standard is applicable to the full range of payload hardware programs including prototype, protoflight, follow-on, spare, and reflight.  The levels and methods set forth herein shall form the basis for developing project-specific requirements for all new payload projects.  Deviations to and tailoring of the standard for the project's specific applications shall be reviewed and approved by the project manager and the appropriate engineering support organization.  As much as possible, these variances shall be identified early in the project's life cycle, e.g., prior to phase C/D implementation.  A permanent record shall be maintained by the project's quality assurance organization.  The standard shall be applicable principally to Class A, B, and C payloads, while Class D payloads may utilize tailoring as stated in 4.3.6.    NASA-STD-7001 June 21, 1996  2  1.4  Summary of verification test requirements.  Maximum expected flight level (MEFL) 95%/50% Probability Level  Test levels Prototype/protoflight qualification MEFL + 3 dB Flight acceptance MEFL - 3 dB Minimum vibration workmanship test 6.8 grms Minimum acoustic workmanship test 138 dB  Test durations Prototype qualification, single mission 2 minutes Prototype qualification, multiple (N) reflights 2 + 0.5N minutes Protoflight qualification 1 minute Flight acceptance 1 minute Payload classification applicability Classes A, B, and C  A minimum workmanship random vibration test specification shall be imposed on electrical, electronic, and electromechanical components weighing less than 50 kilograms (kg) (110 lb.).  The spectrum is given in 4.2.3, Table I.  When the workmanship test level exceeds the prototype/ protoflight and/or the flight acceptance levels, the test levels shall envelope the two spectra.  Random vibration test control tolerances on power spectral densities (PSD's) shall be ±3 decibels (dB).  When the minimum workmanship test level governs in a prototype program, the tolerances shall be such that the acceptance test level never exceeds the qualification test level.  The tolerance on composite root mean square (rms) accelerations shall be ±10 percent.  Acoustic test control tolerances on sound pressure levels (SPL's) shall be ±3 dB from 50 to 3000 hertz (Hz), with facility capability determining the tolerances below 50 Hz and above 3000 Hz. The tolerance on overall SPL's shall be ±1 dB.
70 The objective of this NASA Technical Standard is to provide a consistent  methodology for developing pyroshock test criteria for NASA spacecraft, payload, and launch  vehicle hardware during the development, qualification, flight acceptance, and/or protoflight test  phases of the verification process.  Various aspects of pyroshock testing are discussed herein,  including test environments, methods and facilities, test margins and number of exposures,  control tolerances (when applicable), data acquisition and analysis, test tailoring, dynamic  analysis, and prediction techniques for pyroshock environments.     1.2 Applicability.  This Standard recommends engineering practices for NASA programs  and projects.  It may be cited in contracts and program documents as a technical requirement or  as a reference for guidance.  Determining the suitability of this Standard and its provisions is the  responsibility of program/project management and the performing organization.  Individual  provisions of this Standard may be tailored (i.e., modified or deleted) by contract or specification  to meet specific program/project needs and constraints.     1.3 Background     1.3.1  Pyrotechnic applications.  Current launch vehicle, payload and spacecraft designs  often utilize numerous pyrotechnic devices over the course of their missions.  These devices  are generally used to separate structural subsystems (e.g., payloads from launch vehicles),  deploy appendages (e.g., solar panels), and/or activate on-board operational subsystems (e.g.,  propellant valves).     1.3.2  Pyroshock characteristics.  Pyroshock is often characterized by its high peak  acceleration (up to 300,000 g), high frequency content (up to 1 MHz), and short duration (less  than 20 ms), which is largely dependent on the source type and size or strength, intervening  structural path characteristics (including structural type and configuration, joints, fasteners and  other discontinuities) and distance from the source to the response point of interest.  Because of  the high frequency content, many hardware elements and small components are susceptible to  pyroshock failure while resistant to a variety of lower frequency environments, including random  vibration.  High frequencies may make analytical methods and computational procedures  inapplicable for system verification under pyroshock loading.  Thus, pyroshock verification  should be accomplished experimentally, and pyroshock testing is considered essential to  mission success.     1.3.3  Potential hardware effects.  Many flight hardware failures have been attributed to  pyroshock exposure, some resulting in catastrophic mission loss [5].  Specific examples of  pyroshock failures include cracks and fractures in crystals, ceramics, epoxies, glass envelopes,  solder joints and wire leads, seal failure, migration of contaminating particles, relay and switch  chatter and transfer, and deformation of very small lightweight structural elements, such as  microelectronics.  On the other hand, deformation or failure of major structural elements is rare  except in those regions close to the source where structural failure is intended.    1    NASA-STD-7003  May 18, 1999    1.4 Summary of pyroshock environmental categories.  In this Standard, the pyroshock  environment has been divided into the following three categories, depending on the shock  severity and frequency range:  (a) near-field, (b) mid-field, and (c) far-field.  Detailed definitions  are provided in Section 3.2.3.  The intent of this categorization is to assist hardware and test  personnel in the selection of appropriate test techniques and facilities.  For the near-field, only  pyrotechnic devices should be used.  For the mid-field, either mechanical impact or pyrotechnic  devices should be used.  For the far-field, electrodynamic shakers, impact or pyrotechnic  devices may be used.     1.5 Summary of pyroshock test criteria.  Specific pyroshock test requirements are  selected based on:  (a) the flight or service pyroshock environment as defined in Section 3.2.3;  (b) the environment test categories described in Section 3.2.5; (c) the level of assembly defined  in Section 3.2.6; (d) the maximum expected flight environment as specified in Section 4.2; (e)  test margins as discussed in Section 4.3; (f) test specifications described in Section 4.4; and (g)  the test method and facility as outlined in Section 4.5.
36 This specification covers requirements for pyrotechnic component and system design, development, qualification, acceptance, manufacture, shipping, storage, and service life for unmanned and manned space flight. When this specification is specified on contract documents, the contractor may submit an alternative, corporate, detailed specification that meets the intent of this specification. Industry, government, and company specifications may be used in lieu of this specification if approved by the responsible National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) Technical Authority. 1.1 Purpose This specification provides the criteria for design, manufacture, and performance of pyrotechnic components and pyrotechnic systems for use in unmanned and manned Space Vehicles, e.g. Space Launch System (SLS) Heavy Lift Vehicle (HLV). This specification is not intended for pyrotechnic components installed on launch vehicle payloads but is applicable for upper stage (including kick-stage) pyrotechnic components, payload/vehicle separation pyrotechnic components and payload fairing (shroud) separation pyrotechnic components. 1.2 Applicability This specification is applicable to the launch vehicle pyrotechnic components, pyrotechnic- actuated components, and pyrotechnic systems. Pyrotechnic components include all elements in a pyrotechnic train within a pyrotechnic system. These components include, but are not limited to, initiators, detonators, safe and arm (S&A) devices, explosive transfer lines (ETL), shaped charges, frangible devices, cartridge actuated devices/propellant actuated devices (CAD/PAD), and mechanically actuated devices.
NTSP1 1.1 Purpose      1.1.1 This document supports the implementation of National Aeronautics and Space   Administration (NASA) Procedural Requirements (NPR) 7120.10, Technical Standards for   NASA Programs and Projects. It establishes the NASA Technical Standards Program’s (NTSP’s)   procedures, processes, and systems and is linked to Chapter 4, Development of Technical   Standards, of NPR 7120.10.      1.1.2 This document implements the NASA Preferred Technical Standards Program Plan   approved 10/7/1999, cancels ED10-OWI-005G, NASA Technical Standards Program, and   supersedes the Process for Developing NASA Technical Standards (Engineering) Sponsored by   the NASA Chief Engineer dated 3/14/2011.      1.2 Applicability      This document applies to NASA and contractor employees participating in NTSP activities.
00 1.1 Purpose   This Standard provides a consistent and systematic method for configuration management of  products delivered to or produced by the Agency under configuration control to (a) identify the  configuration of a product at various points in time; (b) systematically control changes to the  configuration of the product; (c) maintain the integrity and traceability of the configuration of the  product throughout its life; and (d) preserve the records of the product configuration throughout its  life cycle, properly dispositioning the records.  NASA CM requirements originate in NPR 7123.1,  NASA Systems Engineering Processes and Requirements.  This standard addresses the planning  and implementation of the following basic CM functions based on EIA-649A, National Consensus  Standard for Configuration Management principles.  These functions are described as:  CM  planning, configuration identification (including interface management), configuration control,  configuration accounting (including configuration traceability), and configuration verification and  audits.    1.2 Applicability   This standard applies to NASA Headquarters and NASA Centers, including component Facilities  and the Jet Propulsion Laboratory, and contractors/service providers to the extent specified in their  contracts with NASA.  This standard may be cited in the CM requirements of NASA  Headquarters, NASA Centers, Programs, Projects, and Supplier contracts/agreements.   This Standard is applicable to NASA investment areas covered under NPR 7120.5, NASA Space  Flight Program and Project Management Requirements; NPR 7120.7 (Draft), NASA Information  Technology and Institutional Infrastructure Program and Project Requirements; and NPR 7120.8,  NASA Research and Technology Program and Project Management Requirements.  This standard  may be applied to other NASA investments at the discretion of NASA management.      This standard applies throughout all phases of the program and project life cycle.   Requirements are numbered and indicated by the word “shall.”  Explanatory or guidance text is  indicated in italics beginning in section 4.     1.2.1 Tailoring of this standard for application to a specific program or project shall be formally  documented as part of program or project requirements.  The requirements of this Standard may  be tailored based on the type and content of an activity.     1.2.2 Tailoring concepts that delete or significantly modify implementing the EIA-649  principles in this Standard shall be assessed on a risk analysis basis in accordance with NPR  8000.4, Risk Management Procedural Requirements.       NASA-STD-0005     APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE—DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED     7 of 143      1.2.3 The basis of assessment shall be “What is the risk associated with not following the EIA- 649 principle?”     1.2.4 The acceptance of the resulting risk shall be approved or disapproved by the responsible  Programmatic or Institutional Authority.     1.3 NASA Configuration Management (CM) Requirements and Planning Hierarchy   Figure 1 shows the flowdown of NASA CM policy including the requirements in NASA-STD- 0005 and its implementing guidance in the handbooks.     NASA Programs/Projects/Centers have the responsibility for developing requirements, and  Suppliers shall develop CMPs to meet these requirements as illustrated in Figure 2.             NPR 7120.5  NPR 7123.1     Center and  Program/Project CM   Requirements   Implementation Guidance in  NASA-STD-0005 and DoD   and Industry Consensus  Handbooks   Figure 1—NASA Configuration Management (CM) Requirements   NASA  CM   Policy   NASA CM   Standard    NASA-STD-0005    NASA-STD-0005     APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE—DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED     8 of 143      1.4 Key Terminology Used in This Standard   a. Supplier:  The organization that applies the CM discipline.  The supplier may be a  contractor, academia, or the Government.  The supplier may be the design agency involved in  production of a product, or be limited to producing documentation.  Note:  The role of  “contractor” is not defined in this document and is assumed to be included within the role of  “supplier.”     b. Program/Project/Center:  The NASA management function for the activity.     c. Configuration Management Organization (CMO):  The collaborative CM effort shared  between the Program/Project/Center and the Supplier.     d. Prescribed Requirement:  A requirement levied on a lower organizational entity by a  higher organizational entity.  These requirements are distinguished from requirements that are  derived at the lower level in order to implement the higher level prescribed requirements.   e. Deviation:  A documented authorization releasing a program or project from meeting a  requirement before the requirement is put under configuration control at the level the requirement  will be implemented.   f. Waiver:  A documented authorization releasing a program or project from meeting a  requirement after the requirement is put under configuration control at the level the requirement  will be implemented.   Figure 2—Configuration Management (CM) Plan Development   Overall CM  Objectives   Program/Project CM   Processes   Supplier CM Processes  and IT Systems   NASA  CM   Policy   Program/Project  CMP   Supplier CMP     NASA-STD-0005     APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE—DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED     9 of 143      g. Contract, Agreement:  Terms utilized interchangeably in this standard to indicate an  agreement between a Supplier and a Program/Project/Center.  This agreement could be between  government organizations (e.g., task agreement) or between the Government and a business  enterprise or academia (e.g., contract).   h. Shall:  The verb “shall” indicates a Supplier requirement.  The collaborative CMO  tasks use the emphatic “shall” to indicate an obligation or requirement on the part of the Supplier.   (An exception is when the Supplier and Program/Project/Center and/or CMO are involved in a  collaborative requirement.  The emphatic “shall” is used as a grammatical convenience and does  not imply special expectation on the Program/Project/Center.  Example:  The  Program/Project/Center and the Supplier shall perform….)   i. Should, May, Can:  Good practices, guidance, or options are specified with the non- emphatic verbs “should,” “may,” or “can.”     j. Will:  The verb “will” describes a fact, expectation, or premise of accomplishment by a  Program/Project/Center.     k. Is:  The verb “is” or verbs without emphatic auxiliaries are used in descriptive material.
28 1.1 Purpose and Scope NASA-STD-2804I effective date 17 May 2005 This standard establishes the minimum software suite required to support interoperability; establishes interface and product standards for components of the software suite operating on PC, Macintosh, and Unix systems; and establishes reporting metrics for determining overall NASA interoperability. 1.2 Applicability Center CIO’s will ensure that all NASA employees at their respective centers have access to an interoperable workstation that is equipped with a minimum software suite that meets the standards listed in Section 3 below. For the functions (components) identified with standard products, future procurements to support interoperability are restricted to these products and enterprise applications. Licenses for other products may not be renewed. Additional products will be added as required. 1.3 Waivers The waiver process set forth in NPR 2800.1, paragraph 2.2.4, applies to this standard. The desktop standards group, in cooperation with the Chief Technical Officer, will continue to process waivers on behalf of the Principal Center for Workgroup Hardware and Software.
28 1.1 Purpose.  This Standard defines the current minimum desktop hardware  configuration that will be used by NASA to support interoperability.  These specifications apply  to all NASA desktop and portable systems that are required to support interoperability.     1.2 Scope.  Desktop hardware below this minimum configuration may be used in areas  where interoperability is not required.  However, Agency workstations used for interoperability  must meet the criteria specified in section 3.3 of this document.     1.3 Waivers.  The waiver process set forth in NPR 2800.1, paragraph 2.2.4, applies to  this standard.  The desktop standards group, in cooperation with the Chief Technical Officer, will  continue to process waivers on behalf of the Principal Center for Workgroup Hardware and  Software.
28 Marshall Space Flight Center (MSFC), chartered by Ames Research Center  (ARC), the NASA Principal Center for IT, has the task to develop an Agency Firewall  Architecture, Standards and Product (ASP) document.  The MSFC approach has been to  cultivate dialog with appropriate Agency entities and individuals, actively involve other Centers  in order to share expertise and input, perform hands-on technology evaluation, and ultimately  develop the Firewall ASP within the current Agency CIO, Principal Center and Network  Consolidation activities.     1.2  Purpose.  This document provides a framework for a consistent, Agency-wide  approach toward the implementation of Firewalls within NASA.  In recognition of the fact that  NASA Centers, as well as Projects within a Center, have different mission goals and  requirements, this Architecture is intended to allow significant Center discretion concerning the  deployment and use of Firewall technologies to meet Center requirements.  Risk assessment  and the resultant security policies, processes and IT implementations are the responsibility of  Centers and Projects.  At the same time, it is the goal of this Architecture to ensure  interoperability between NASA Centers, facilitate efficient use of Agency IT resources (capital  and labor) and articulate a concise, actionable approach that positions the deployment of  network security within the context of an over-all Agency IT security policy.     1.3 Applicability.  It is important to note that developing a single detailed Firewall  architecture or strategy to fulfill every Center’s needs, without understanding their specific  security requirements or network environment, is not practical or within the scope of this  document.  Keeping the absence of specific Center requirements in mind, the intent is the initial  introduction of a document providing a framework or guidelines for consistent Agency-level  Firewall implementations that foster compatibility and interoperability.  Each Center will need to  determine the level of protection required for their individual IT resources, establish their  security policies, develop a Firewall implementation plan to assist in enforcing those policies,  and understand that Firewalls are only one of several tools required to provide IT security. Cost,  performance, support, available technology, and interoperability issues (in addition to security  related issues) must be addressed while developing implementation plans. As NASA Firewall  deployments become common and Firewall standards and technologies mature, the  experiences and “lessons learned” should be used to update this document and share the  evolving “Firewall expertise” across the Agency.
28 The DTV system standards described in this document are associated with those industrial or professional systems used to produce full-motion and full-resolution digital video imagery that is suitable for critical closed-circuit or broadcast use and that is normally distributed over wide-bandwidth communications systems designed for the transmission of television. It is not the intention of the DTVWG or the Office of the Chief Information Officer to imply or endorse the use of any specific commercial vendor standards, designs, or hardware. For the purposes of this document, the uses for critical video acquisition, contribution, production, and distribution within NASA are considered as falling into one of two broad categories: Engineering and Publication. (These categories were previously called Analysis and Program.) Engineering video is defined as video imagery that is acquired primarily for the purpose of being used by NASA or other authorized personnel, either in real time or post event, to observe, analyze, or document a NASA technical or operational activity. Examples of Engineering video include imagery of space launch and space flight activities, flight vehicle tests, laboratory and facility testing, scientific experiments, and training. Systems used for critical Engineering video acquisition normally require the highest technical imaging performance. Some less critical Engineering video, which may include general surveillance imagery not meant to capture important details or aspects of the activity or video unlikely to be used as source material for Publication video programs, may have reduced image performance requirements. Publication video is defined as video imagery that is acquired primarily for the purpose of being integrated into live television segments or edited programs that are created for disseminating information concerning NASA activities within the Agency and/or for release to the news media or the public. Examples of these programs include educational or training videos, televised briefings or press conferences, video-file material, live shots, and video coverage of other NASA events. Systems used for Publication video often strive for high artistic as well as high technical imaging performance, although it is acknowledged that video of any quality may be considered usable for coverage of a newsworthy or historically significant event. It is also noted that Publication video programs may be produced partially or in their entirety using video imagery originally acquired for Engineering purposes. NASA organizations must determine their needs and select and use video equipment and systems capable of satisfying whichever are their most critical imagery requirements. These DTV standards shall apply to all NASA Center systems infrastructure used to acquire, produce, and distribute Engineering and Publication video. It is recognized that the specific analysis needs or unique constraints associated with certain flight, test, or laboratory imaging could require the use of specialized imagery systems that may not precisely adhere to these DTV standards. If any programs or projects that use specialized systems require NASA Center DTV infrastructure services, they shall be required to convert their nonstandard signals or products to meet the NASA DTV infrastructure standards at an interface point. This document does not, at this time, discuss or provide standards for the implementation of digital video other than regular full-motion and full-resolution systems or video that uses other than wideband communications systems designed specifically for standard video transmission. These other motion imagery categories include systems used for video surveillance, for very high-speed imagery, for teleconferencing video, or for the streaming distribution of live video or on-demand video segments to viewers over a computer intranet or the Internet. 1.2    Applicability. This standard recommends engineering practices for NASA programs and projects. It may be cited in contracts and program documents as a technical requirement or as a reference for guidance. Adherence to this standard and its provisions is the responsibility of program/project management and the performing organization. It is recognized that some specific circumstances, such as activities jointly pursued with a commercial or international partner, may involve or require the use of DTV equipment that varies from these standards. However, organizations are otherwise obliged to use systems that adhere to the guidance within this document unless there are specific functional or performance requirements of a particular DTV application, project, or program that prohibit the use of these standards. Inquiries regarding exceptions to this standard should be directed to the NASA DTV Program Control Board. Information about requesting an exception is available through the DTV Working Group voting member at each Center or at http./' /dtv.msfc.nasa.gov.
28 This standard establishes required technologies and practices for encryption and digital signatures within the agency and establishes interface and product standards for securing NASA’s Information Technology (IT) data and information. This standard also establishes reporting metrics for determining overall NASA compliance with Federal and NASA IT security standards. 2.2. Applicability. All Center CIO's are required to ensure that all NASA employees are securing systems, data, and information in a manner that is commensurate with the risk associated with those systems, data, and information. Each Center will determine how best to integrate these technologies and practices for encryption and digital signatures within their infrastructures.
30 1.1 Purpose    NASA policy for establishing standards to protect the health and safety of crew, and for  providing health and medical programs for crewmembers during all phases of space flight, is  authorized by NPD 1000.3, The NASA Organization, and NPD 8900.5, NASA Health and  Medical Policy for Human Space Exploration.  NPD 8900.1, Medical Operations  Responsibilities in Support of Human Space Flight Programs and NPD 8900.3, Astronaut  Medical and Dental Observation Study and Care Program, authorize the specific provision of  health and medical programs for crewmembers.  NASA's policy is to establish standards for  providing a healthy and safe environment for crewmembers, and to provide health and medical  programs for crewmembers during all phases of space flight.  Standards are established to  optimize crew health and performance, thus contributing to overall mission success, and to  prevent negative long-term health consequences due to space flight.  In this document, the Office  of the Chief Health and Medical Officer establishes NASA’s space flight Crew Health standards  for the pre-flight, in-flight, and post-flight phases of human space flight.    Human system standards are established to guide and focus the development of the crew health  requirements as a means of protecting space-faring crews.  The standards presented in this  document, NASA Space Flight Human System Standards, Volume I:  Crew Health, are intended  to complement the overall set of human standards for space flight, which also includes NASA  Space Flight Human Systems Standards, Volume II:  Habitability and Environmental Health;  NASA Medical Standard for Crewmembers; and current medical standards of clinical practice.  Combined, these standards provide Agency technical requirements for an appropriate  environment for human habitation, certification of human participants, the necessary level of  medical care, and risk-mitigation strategies against the deleterious effects of space flight. The  standards described in this document include levels of care, permissible exposure limits, fitness- for-duty criteria, and permissible outcome limits as a means of defining successful operating  criteria for the human system.  These standards help ensure mission completion, limit morbidity,  and reduce the risk of mortality during space flight missions.  See Appendix A for an overview  document map.     All standards are based on the best available scientific and clinical evidence, as well as  operational experience from Apollo, Skylab, Shuttle, Shuttle/MIR (United Soviet Socialists  Republic (USSR) Space Station), and International Space Station (ISS) missions.  Standards are  periodically and regularly reviewed, especially as the concept of operations and mission  parameters for a program become defined, and may be updated as new evidence emerges.       NASA-STD-3001, Volume 1       APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE – DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED      9 of 68   A Crew Health Concept of Operations document is developed by the Space Medicine Division at  the Johnson Space Center (JSC) for each space flight program and coordinated with the  appropriate Program Manager for concurrence.  See Appendix B for an example Crew Health  Concept of Operations outline.    Following the development of the Crew Health Concept of Operations, a Medical Operations  Requirements Document (MORD) is developed by the JSC Space Medicine Division for each  program.  The MORD details the medical requirements for the program, and is consistent with  the overall medical concept outlined in the Crew Health Concept document.  See Appendix C for  an example outline of a MORD.   1.2 Applicability    These standards apply to all NASA human space flight programs and are not developed for any  specific program.  However, while some of the existing programs, such as the Space Shuttle and  ISS Programs, meet the intent and purpose of these standards currently, these standards may  have implications for longer duration missions and missions with architectures and objectives  outside of low Earth orbit (LEO).  Although the standards are applicable to the in-flight phase of  all space missions, it is anticipated that they are most relevant during long-duration lunar outpost  and Mars exploration missions, since the combined ill effects of exposure to the space  environment is of most concern in those mission scenarios.  The standards and technical  requirements specified in this volume shall      a. Apply to all space exploration programs and activities involving crewmembers.     b. Apply to internationally provided space systems as documented in distinct separate  agreements such as joint or multilateral agreements.      c. Be made applicable to contractors only through contract clauses, specifications, or  statements of work in conformance with the NASA Federal Acquisition Regulation (FAR)  supplement and not as direct instructions to contractors.      d. Supersede any conflicting crew health requirements imposed by other NASA  standards.    This standard may be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a technical  requirement.  Mandatory requirements are indicated by the word “shall,” statement of fact and  descriptive material by “is,” and permission by “may” or “can.”  Tailoring of, deviation from, or  waivers to this standard for application to a specific program or project shall be approved by the  NASA Chief Health and Medical Officer.       NASA-STD-3001, Volume 1       APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE – DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED      10 of 68   1.3 Overview    The Space Flight Human System Standard, Volume I:  Crew Health considers human  physiologic parameters as a system, much as one views the engineering and design of a  mechanical device.  Doing so allows the human system to be viewed as an integral part of the  overall vehicle design process, as well as the mission reference design, treating the human  system as one system along with the many other systems that work in concert to allow the  nominal operation of a vehicle and successful completion of a mission.     Volume 1, Crew Health covers the main physiologic parameters associated with the health and  successful operation of the human system.  It is not all encompassing, but does address those  areas where the human system has shown particular vulnerability in response to adaptation or  exposure to microgravity.  The standards set forth in this volume serve as a guideline to develop  requirements for maintaining the human system within normal operating parameters.  To achieve  this aim, the standards of the human system should be considered in vehicle design, mission  architecture, countermeasures, and future directed research.  Many of the standards are not in  their mature forms and are not fully identified for all areas, perhaps because of a lack of  knowledge as to the human system physiology for that length and scale of mission, or other  reasons.  In such cases, top-level functional standards for these are cited, and further work is/may  be required to define the standard more accurately.    A cascading effect is often seen with system failures in engineering, and so it is with the human  system as well.
40 This standard defines the basic electrical bonding requirements for NASA  launch vehicles, spacecraft, payloads, and equipment.      1.2 Purpose.  The intent of this standard is to provide fundamental aerospace electrical  bonding requirements.  This standard classifies electrical bonds according to their purpose and  states the requirements for the various classes.  The rationale for specific requirements is  stated where possible.  Additional data is provided to support tailoring for new applications if  necessary.      1.3 Applicability.  This Standard recommends engineering practices for NASA programs  and projects.  It may be cited in contracts and program documents as a technical requirement or  as a reference for guidance.  Determining the suitability of this Standard and its provisions is the  responsibility of program/project management and the performing organization.  Individual  provisions of this standard may be tailored (i.e. modified or deleted) by contract or program  specifications to meet specific program/project needs and constraints.
40 This standard provides requirements relative to various plasma interactions that can result when  a high-voltage system is operated in the Earth’s ionosphere and standard practices to eliminate or  mitigate such reactions.   1.1 Purpose   The purpose of this standard is to provide a design standard for high-voltage space power  systems (> 55 volts (V)) that operate in the plasma environment associated with LEO (altitude  from 200 and 1000 km and latitude between -50 and +50 degrees).  Such power systems,  particularly solar arrays, are the proximate cause of spacecraft charging in LEO; and these  systems can interact with this environment in a number of ways that are potentially destructive to  themselves as well as to the platform or vehicle that has deployed them.    High-voltage systems are used in space for two reasons.  The first reason is to save launch  weight.  First of all, for the same power level, higher voltages enable use of thinner wires (lighter  cabling).  This is true because P = IV, and V = IR, so P = I2R (where P is power, I is current, R is  resistance, and V is voltage).  If I is decreased by use of higher V, then thinner wires can be used  with no increase in power loss due to cabling.  Of course, if one uses the same cable mass, higher  voltages will enable higher efficiencies, since less power will be lost to resistance in the cables.   For very large power systems, the decrease in cable mass can be substantial.    Second, some spacecraft functions require high voltages.  For example, electric propulsion uses  voltages from about 300 V (Hall thrusters) to about 1000 V (ion thrusters).  For low-voltage  power systems, conversion of substantial power to high voltages is required for these spacecraft  functions to operate.  The weight of the power conversion systems, power management and  distribution (PMAD), can be a substantial fraction of the total power system weight in these  cases.  It is more efficient, and can save weight, if the high-voltage functions can be directly  powered from a high-voltage solar array, for instance.  If the high-voltage function is electric  propulsion, we call such a system a direct-drive electric propulsion system.      Because of these and other reasons for using high voltages in space, spacecraft designers and  manufacturers are using high voltages more and more.  However, the use of high voltages entails  risk; in particular, spacecraft charging in LEO, in contrast to that in geosynchronous earth  orbit (GEO), is caused by exposed high voltages, and can lead to arcing, power drains, power  disruptions, and loss of spacecraft coatings.  Thus, system designers need a standard to show  them how to mitigate the spacecraft charging effects of using high voltages in LEO.  In addition  to system designers, this document should be useful to project managers, solar array designers,  system engineers, etc.    This document is intended as a standard for design applications and can be used as a  requirements specification instrument.      NASA-STD-4005           6 of 16   1.2 Applicability    This standard is applicable to high-voltage space power systems that operate in the plasma environment  associated with LEO.    This standard is intended for space systems that spend the majority of their time at altitudes  between 200 and 1000 km (usually known as LEO applications) and at latitudes between about  + and -50 degrees — that is, space systems that do not encounter GEO (geosynchronous orbit)  charging conditions, that do not (often) encounter the auroral ovals of electron streams, and that  do not fly through the Van Allen belts.  For the extreme radiation protection that is necessary  for orbits in the Van Allen belts, exterior spacecraft charging will likely be a secondary  concern.  However, internal charging will be very important.  It is not in the purview of this  document to deal with internal charging.    Some of the design standards for LEO are at variance with good design practice for GEO  spacecraft.  If your spacecraft will fly in both LEO and GEO conditions, be careful to use design  solutions that are applicable in both environmental regimes.   This standard may be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a technical  requirement.  Mandatory requirements are indicated by the word “shall.”   Tailoring of this  standard for application to a specific program or project shall be approved by the Technical  Authority for that program or project.
50 1.1  Purpose.  This standard establishes structural strength design and test factors, as well as service life factors to be used for spaceflight hardware development and verification.  It is intended to reduce space project costs and schedules by enhancing the commonalty of use of hardware designs between NASA flight projects, Centers, and their contractors.  While it is true that structural designs are sometimes governed by criteria other than strength, the criteria in this document are to be considered as minimum acceptable values unless adequate engineering risk assessment is provided which justifies the use of lower values.  1.2  Applicability.  This standard recommends engineering practices for NASA programs and projects.  It may be cited in contracts and program documents as a technical requirement or as a reference for guidance.  Determining the suitability of this standard and its provisions is the responsibility of program/project management and the performing organization.  Individual provisions of this standard may be tailored (i.e., modified or deleted) by contract or program specifications to meet specific program/project needs and constraints.  Where this document is adopted or imposed by contract on a program or project, the technical guidelines of this document take precedence, in the case of conflict, over the technical guidelines cited in other referenced documents.  Project specific tailoring may generate other project specific requirements that are derivatives of this standard.  This document shall not supersede applicable laws and regulations unless a specific exemption has been obtained.  The criteria in this standard are applicable to launch vehicles, including their propellant tanks and solid rocket motor cases, and payloads.  These criteria apply to flight hardware which is utilized for NASA missions.  The standard presents acceptable minimum factors of safety for use in analytical assessment and test verification of structural adequacy of the flight hardware. Designs must generally be verified by both structural strength analyses and tests.  The factors are to be multiplied by the limit stresses (including additive thermal stresses), and the products must be verified not to exceed material allowable stresses (yield and ultimate) under the expected temperatures and other operating conditions.  Criteria are specified for design and test of flight articles where the actual flight hardware is tested (protoflight), and where qualification tests are conducted on a separate (prototype) article.  In general, no distinction is made between “manned” and “unmanned” missions. Structures of manned flight systems may be subjected to additional verification and/or safety requirements (e.g., fracture control) that are consistent with the established risk levels for mission success and flight crew safety.  The requirements specifically excluded from this standard are:  design loads determination, fracture control, pressure vessels, pressurized components, engines, rotating hardware, solid propellant, insulation, ground support equipment, and facilities.  Also excluded are specific configuration factors, such as fitting factors, buckling knockdown factors, and load uncertainty factors.  1.3  Constraints and preconditions.  The criteria of this standard were developed in the context of structural and mechanical systems designs which are amenable to engineering analyses by current state-of-the-art methods and conforming to standard aerospace industry    NASA-STD-5001 June 21, 1996  2  practices.  More specifically, the designs are assumed to use materials having mechanical properties that are well characterized for the intended service environments and all design conditions.  For reusable and multi-mission hardware, these criteria are applicable throughout the design service life and all of the missions.  Therefore, design considerations must include material property degradation under the service environments.  Material allowables shall be chosen to minimize the probability of structural failure due to material variability.  Allowables shall be based on sufficient material tests to establish values on a statistical basis.  Further, the service environments and limit loads shall be well defined, and aerospace standard manufacturing and process controls shall be used in the hardware fabrication and handling. Test hardware shall be representative of the flight configuration.
50 1.1 Purpose   The purpose of this standard is to establish NASA structural strength design and test factors, as  well as service life factors to be used for spaceflight hardware development and verification.  It  is intended to reduce space project costs and schedules by enhancing the commonalty of use of  hardware designs among NASA flight projects, Centers, and their contractors.  While it is true  that structural designs are sometimes governed by criteria other than strength, the criteria in this  document are to be considered as minimum acceptable values unless adequate engineering risk  assessment is provided which justifies the use of lower values.    1.2 Applicability   This standard recommends engineering practices for NASA programs and projects.  It may be  cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a technical requirement.   Requirements are numbered and indicated by the word “shall.”  Explanatory text or guidance is  indicated in italics beginning in section 4.     1.2.1 Tailoring of this standard for application to a specific program or project shall be  formally documented as part of program/project requirements and approved by the assigned  Technical Authority.    Determining the suitability of this standard and its provisions is the responsibility of  program/project management and the performing organization.  Project-specific tailoring may  generate other project-specific requirements that are derivatives of this standard.      1.2.2 NASA programs and projects that do not meet the provisions of this document shall be  assessed by the NASA Program Manager for the associated risk to the success of the planned  NASA mission and approved by the assigned Technical Authority.      1.2.3 This document shall not supersede applicable laws and regulations unless a specific  exemption has been obtained by the Office of the NASA Chief Engineer.    The criteria in this standard are applicable to payloads and launch vehicle structures (including  propellant tanks and solid rocket motor (SRM) cases).  These criteria apply to flight hardware  that is utilized for NASA missions.  The standard presents acceptable minimum factors of safety  for use in analytical assessment and test verification of structural adequacy of the flight  hardware.  Designs must generally be verified by both structural strength analyses and tests.         NASA-STD-5001A       APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE – DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED     7 of 20   1.2.4 The factors shall be multiplied by the limit stresses (including additive thermal stresses),  and the products shall be verified not to exceed material allowable stresses (yield and ultimate)  under the expected temperatures and other operating conditions.    Criteria are specified for design and test of flight articles when the actual flight hardware is  tested (protoflight), and when qualification tests are conducted on a separate (prototype) article.   In general, no distinction is made between “manned” and “unmanned” missions.  Structures of  manned flight systems may be subjected to additional verification and/or safety requirements  (e.g., fracture control) that are consistent with the established risk levels for mission success and  flight crew safety.   The requirements specifically excluded from this standard are design loads determination,  fracture control, engines, rotating hardware, solid propellant, insulation, ground support  equipment, and facilities.  Also excluded are specific configuration factors, such as fitting  factors, buckling knockdown factors, and load uncertainty factors.   1.3 Constraints and Preconditions   The criteria of this standard were developed in the context of structural and mechanical systems  designs that are amenable to engineering analyses by current state-of-the-art methods and  conforming to standard aerospace industry practices.  More specifically, the designs are assumed  to use materials having mechanical properties that are well characterized for the intended service  environments and all design conditions.  For reusable and multi-mission hardware, these criteria  are applicable throughout the design service life and all of the missions.     1.3.1 Therefore, design considerations shall include material property degradation under the  service environments.     1.3.2 Material allowables shall be chosen to minimize the probability of structural failure due  to material variability.     1.3.3 Allowables shall be based on sufficient material tests to establish values on a statistical  basis.     1.3.4 Further, the service environments and limit loads shall be well defined.   1.3.5 Aerospace standard manufacturing and process controls shall be used in hardware  fabrication and handling.   1.3.6 Test hardware shall be representative of the flight configuration.     NASA-STD-5001A       APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE – DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED     8 of 20
50 1.1 Purpose.  This standard establishes the general characteristics, performance, design,  test, safety, reliability, maintainability, supportability, and quality requirements for ground support  systems and equipment intended for use at NASA launch, landing, or retrieval locations.  This  standard specifies the criteria to provide simple, robust, safe, reliable, maintainable, supportable,  and cost-effective ground support equipment (GSE) necessary to support space vehicle and  payload launch operations.     1.2 Applicability.  This standard recommends preferred engineering practices for NASA  programs and projects.  It may be cited in contracts and program documents as a technical  requirement or as a reference for guidance.  Determining the suitability of this standard and its  provisions is the responsibility of program/project management and the performing organization.   Individual provisions of this standard may be tailored (i.e., modified or deleted) by contract or  program specifications to meet specific program/project needs and constraints.    This standard is not intended to be self-imposing.  The criteria specified herein shall be the  baseline or preferred guidelines for NASA programs, but selection and tailoring to meet specific  needs are the responsibility of individual programs.  Existing programs and contracts may  continue to use existing program or contract-unique GSE design requirements for the life of the  program or contract (including follow-on contracts) on existing or new GSE for that program or  contract.  Retrofit of existing GSE to comply with this standard is at the discretion of the  applicable program or project office.  When this standard is used in a procurement action, the  standard should be reviewed by the program/project office for applicability, and only the  sections that apply to the project or program should be included in the procurement  documentation.  The revision of this standard that was current at the time directions are issued  to design, construct, manufacture, or procure the GSE shall be applicable for the useful life of  the GSE.  Modifications of existing GSE may be done so the modified GSE complies with the  revision that is current at the time directions are issued to modify the GSE.  This standard does  not apply to facilities.    The criteria of this standard may be used for the GSE used at the manufacturing, development, or  test sites prior to arrival at the launch, landing, or retrieval sites.  This standard is recommended  for the design of nonflight hardware and software used to support the operations of transporting,  receiving, handling, assembly, test, checkout, service, launch, and recovery of space vehicles and  payloads at the launch, landing, or retrieval sites.  The criteria specified in this standard are  recommended for high-risk program and project GSE.  GSE for medium- and low-risk programs  and projects may use the criteria stated herein at the discretion of the program/project office.   Refer to NPG 7120.5 for definition of the high-, medium-, and low-risk programs and projects.
50 1.1 Purpose    This Standard establishes top-level requirements and guidance for design and fabrication of  ground support equipment (GSE) to assist National Aeronautics and Space Administration  (NASA) space flight programs/projects in providing robust, safe, reliable, maintainable,  supportable, and cost-effective GSE.    1.2 Applicability     a. The application of this Standard to NASA space flight programs is at the discretion of  the program.  This Standard recommends a set of GSE design requirements for NASA programs  and projects.  This Standard is intended for use in establishing uniform engineering practices and  methods and ensuring that essential requirements are included in the design, procurement, and  fabrication of GSE used to support the operations of receiving, transportation, handling,  assembly, inspection, test, checkout, service, launch, and recovery of space vehicles and  payloads at NASA’s launch, landing, or retrieval locations.     b. This Standard is approved for use by NASA Headquarters and NASA Centers, including   Component Facilities and Technical and Service Support Centers, and may be cited in contract,  program, and other Agency documents as a technical requirement.  This Standard may also apply to  the Jet Propulsion Laboratory or to contractors, grant recipients, or parties to agreements only to the  extent specified or referenced in their contracts, grants, or agreements.       c. Requirements are numbered and indicated by the word “shall.”  Explanatory or   guidance text is indicated in italics beginning in section 4.    d. Programs, projects, and elements are responsible for flowing requirements down to   contractors, subcontractors, and suppliers of components at the lowest level.  Program  contractors may elect to manufacture deliverable GSE to flight hardware requirements if using  flight hardware requirements (1) does not increase risk, (2) represents an overall cost savings,  and (3) does not violate local, State, or federal laws.     e. Along with identifying this Standard for design and development of GSE, programs,  in conjunction with Engineering and Safety and Mission Assurance (S&MA) organizations, have  the responsibility to:      (1) Determine categories or types of GSE (e.g., critical vs. noncritical) and any  additional requirements resulting from these categories or types.        NASA-STD-5005C     APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE — DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED     13 of 78   (2) Establish and define where this Standard will be applied and when such  boundaries require clarification.     (3) Establish program- and project-specific requirements.    (4) Establish minimum configuration management systems to retain the required   documentation.     f. This Standard does not apply to the following:     (1)  Equipment that is used solely during the manufacturing of flight hardware.  (2) Ground support systems (GSSs) that interface with GSE.   (3) Facilities.  (4) Tools.     1.3 Tailoring    Tailoring of this Standard for application to a specific program or project shall be formally  documented as part of program or project requirements and approved by the Technical Authority.
50 This document establishes requirements for the application of protective  coatings to prevent corrosion of exposed carbon steel, stainless steel, and aluminum.      1.2 Purpose.  This document provides a design standard for experienced corrosion  control engineers for the development of specifications including requirements for materials,  equipment, safety, procedures, and quality assurance inspections.  Due to the ever changing  environmental considerations, new advances in corrosion technology and the wide array of  possible applications, this document shall not be used as a stand-alone standard that meets  every contingency.  Refer to 7.1 for the intended use and surfaces to be coated according to  this standard.  Refer to Appendices A, B, and C for approved coating materials.     1.3 Applicability.  This standard is applicable to facilities, launch structures, ground  support equipment (GSE), test facilities, and structures that are intended for use at all NASA  locations worldwide.     1.4  Zones of exposure.  The following zones of exposure are established to define coating  system requirements for surfaces located in specific environments:     a. Zone 1.  Surfaces that receive rocket engine exhaust impingement.     b. Zone 2.  Surfaces that receive elevated temperatures (above 65 degrees Celsius  [above 150 degrees Fahrenheit]) and/or acid deposition from solid rocket booster exhaust with  no exhaust impingement.     c. Zone 3a.  Surfaces, other than those located in Zones 1 or 2, that receive acid  deposition from solid rocket booster exhaust products.        Zone 3b.  Surfaces that receive other types of chemical contamination (e.g., cooling  towers, diesel exhaust stacks, acidic industrial environments, and water treatment facilities).     d. Zone 4a.  Surfaces not located in the launch environment but located in a neutral pH  corrosive marine industrial, or other chloride-containing environments.        Zone 4b.  Surfaces located in neutral pH exterior environments in any geographical  area.      Zone 4c.  Surfaces located in indoor nonair-conditioned environments.     e. Zone 5.  Continuous indoor air-conditioned environment such as offices or clean  rooms.  These areas shall have both temperature and humidity controlled more than 90 percent  of the time.     f. Zone 6.  Underground, intermittent, or continuous immersion in aqueous environments.     1     NASA-STD-5008A  January 21, 2004    g. Zone 7.  Surfaces under thermal insulation, such as chilled water, steam, and heated  gas lines.     1.5 Method of specifying coating requirements.  Specifications referencing this standard  shall include the type of surface to be coated, the zone of exposure, surface preparation, defined  paint system, coating thicknesses and, when applicable, the finish color required.  These  requirements should be assembled in a coating schedule for easy reference.  The coating  specification shall contain the following key elements:  scope, applicable documents, submittals,  environmental protection, waste management, safety/personnel protection, materials, tools and  equipment, environmental conditions, work schedule, surface preparation (including a listing of  abrasive-sensitive hardware to be prepared or protected), coating schedule, coating mixing and  application, quality control inspection, reporting, and final acceptance.  See Appendix D for a  recommended outline and coating schedule of a coating specification.     1.6 Environmental stewardship.  Environmental, health, and safety impacts of processes  and materials should be taken into account when employing protective coating methods and  techniques.  Alternative, environmentally friendly materials, which do not contain hexavalent  chromium, lead, cadmium, or hazardous air pollutants (HAPs), such as methyl ethyl ketone,  toluene, and xylene, should be considered when determining the appropriate coating  method/technique for each protective coating application.  Coatings containing these hazardous  materials are involved in a variety of air, water, and soil pollution concerns.  Exposure to these  materials also has health impacts that include eye and respiratory irritation, headache,  dizziness, memory impairment, neurotoxicity and cancer.
50 1.1 Purpose   The purpose of this standard is to establish the nondestructive evaluation (NDE) requirements for  any NASA system or component, flight or ground, where fracture control is a requirement.  This  standard defines the primary requirements for NDE in support of NASA-STD-5019, Fracture  Control Requirements for Spaceflight Hardware.  NDE applied in-process for purposes of process  control is not addressed in this document.    It is the policy of NASA to produce aerospace flight systems with a high degree of reliability and  safety.  This is accomplished through good design, manufacturing, test, and operational practices  including the judicious choice of materials, detailed analysis, appropriate factors of safety, rigorous  testing and control of hardware, and reliable inspection.  NASA fracture control requirements  stipulate that all aerospace flight systems be subjected to fracture control procedures to preclude  catastrophic failure.  Those procedures frequently rely on NDE to ensure that significant crack-like  flaws are not present in critical areas.       a. NDE processes shall meet the requirements in this standard to screen hardware reliably  for the presence of crack-like flaws.       b. Nothing in this document shall be construed as requiring duplication of effort dictated by  other contract provisions.       c. Conversely, provisions stated herein shall not be interpreted to preclude compliance with  requirements invoked by other provisions.      1.2 Applicability   This standard is applicable to the fracture control of metal components, e.g. aluminum, steel,  titanium, and nickel alloys for any NASA system or component, flight or ground, where fracture  control is a requirement.     Conditional notes on applicability are presented in section 4.2.3.     a. The requirements described herein shall apply to fracture-critical hardware developed  for NASA by NASA Centers, international partners, contractors, and outside organizations.     NASA-STD-5009       APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE—DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED     8 of 28   This standard may be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a technical  requirement.  Mandatory requirements are indicated by the word “shall”; explanatory or  guidance text is indicated in italics.      b. Tailoring for application to a specific program or project shall be formally  documented as part of program or project requirements and approved by the Technical  Authority.
50 This standard provides strength and life assessment requirements for National Aeronautics and  Space Administration (NASA) liquid fueled space propulsion system engines.  "Life," as used in  this standard, refers to fatigue and creep.  The requirements address analyses and tests to qualify  an engine structurally.  The total system requirements for engine hot-fire tests are not addressed  in these requirements; however, a minimum number of such tests must be conducted in  conjunction with structural analyses and tests to qualify the engine structurally.  These  requirements define the minimum structural requirements acceptable to NASA.  These  requirements specify analyses and test factors, margins, and other parameters where appropriate.   In some cases, these requirements are expressed by reference to other standards.   1.1 Purpose   The purpose of this standard is to provide a consistent set of requirements to be used in designing  and assessing liquid fueled space propulsion system engines.  These requirements are intended to  provide strength and life criteria which, in conjunction with other good engineering practices,  will assist the program in meeting engine performance goals.   1.2 Applicability    This standard may be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a  technical requirement.  The full requirements of this standard shall be addressed for liquid  fueled space propulsion engines of 6K pounds thrust or more, and applied to smaller  engines as required.  Individual provisions of this standard may be tailored (i.e., modified  or deleted) by contract or program specifications to meet specific program/project needs  and constraints.  Tailoring shall be formally documented and approved as part of  program/project requirements.     The requirements in this standard apply to liquid fueled engine hardware used for NASA  spaceflight missions.  This standard presents acceptable minimum factors of safety for use in  analytical assessment and test verification of the flight hardware's structural adequacy.  Designs  must generally be verified by both analyses and tests.   In general, no distinction is made between engines to be used for transporting personnel or those  used for transporting hardware only.  Engines for flight systems transporting personnel shall be  subjected to additional verification and/or safety requirements (such as fracture control) that are  consistent with the established risk levels for mission success and flight crew safety.          NASA-STD-5012        7 of 23
50 1.1 Purpose   The purpose of this standard is to establish common design and development requirements  across National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA) Centers for the design of  aerospace mechanisms whose correct operation is required for safety or program success.   Collecting the requirements in a NASA standard allows each NASA program to rely upon an  established set of practices that have proved heritage and that have been developed from lessons  learned across a spectrum of design applications.  This standard is designed to be applied to  flight mechanisms that are designed, built, or acquired by or for NASA, though it may also serve  as a useful guidance document for other systems such as ground support equipment (GSE).  This  document addresses technical functional requirements only and specifically does not address  human factors requirements.   1.2 Applicability   This standard may be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a technical  requirement.  When this standard is applied, individual provisions of this standard may be tailored  (i.e., modified or deleted) by contract or program specifications to meet specific program/project  needs and constraints.  When requirements are noted as mandatory (indicated by use of the word  “shall”), tailoring shall be formally documented and approved as part of program/project  requirements.    Adherence to this standard in and of itself does not exempt a mechanism from any safety, fault- tolerance, or hazard control requirements.  Any such reduction in requirements must be  established and approved at the program’s inception by the appropriate technical authority of the  program invoking this standard.
50 1.1 Introduction   NASA’s policy is to produce flight systems with a high degree of reliability and safety.  This is  accomplished through sound engineering practices in the design, analyses, inspections, testing,  fabrication, maintenance, and operation of flight structures.  In keeping with this policy, fracture  control shall be required on all human-rated space systems to preclude catastrophic failure.   Fracture control provides a specialized methodology to address the consequences of naturally  occurring and service-induced flaws, damage, or cracks in a part or structure.  This document  establishes the fracture control requirements for all human-rated spaceflight systems including  payloads, propulsion systems, orbital support equipment, and planetary habitats.    A viable fracture control program relies on design, analysis, testing, nondestructive evaluation  (NDE), and tracking of fracture-critical hardware.  It is expected that all spaceflight hardware  will be manufactured consistent with industrial standards, practices, and quality.  It is beyond the  scope, or intent, of this document to address technical or quality disciplines that should already  exist and be in place regardless of fracture control.  Fracture control is imposed and required to  enhance the safety and mission reliability of systems by reducing the risk of catastrophic failure.    It is recommended that the fracture control practitioners become familiar with all portions of this  standard.  The requirements are contained in section 4.  Section 1.4 addresses responsibilities in  fracture control.  Applicable fracture control requirements documents are provided in section 2.   Reference documents are provided in section 5.  Section 4.1 addresses non-fracture-critical and  fracture-critical hardware for generic and specific hardware items.  The methodology for  assessing fracture-critical parts is provided in section 4.2, and tracking for these parts is provided  in section 4.3.  Section 4.4 provides documentation descriptions, section 4.5 provides verification  requirements, and section 4.6 provides alternative methods for fracture control.  Section 4.7  provides other requirements.  An acronym list and definitions are given in section 3.  NASA- HDBK-5010, Fracture Control Implementation Handbook for Payloads, Experiments, and  Similar Hardware, provides useful guidance and examples for meeting the fracture control  requirements contained in this document.   1.2 Purpose    Fracture control is implemented to reduce the risk of a catastrophic failure from a defect or  damage.  The intent of this standard is to provide fracture control requirements for spaceflight  hardware.  A variety of fracture control considerations and options are addressed, some of which  may not be applicable to a given design.  Information is provided to assist the user in the  development of an effective Fracture Control Plan and other fracture control documentation.     NASA-STD-5019     APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE—DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED     8 of 44   1.3 Applicability   These requirements are not imposed on systems other than human-rated spaceflight but may be  tailored for use in specific cases where it is prudent to do so, such as when national assets are at  risk.  This standard may be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a  technical requirement.  Mandatory requirements are indicated by the word “shall”;  explanatory/guidance text is indicated in italics in sections 4 and 5.  Tailoring of this standard for  application to a specific program or project shall be approved by Technical Authority through the  Responsible Fracture Control Board (RFCB) for that program or project.   1.4 Responsibilities    The NASA Center responsible for the manned spaceflight system shall be responsible for  designating fracture control authorities and for assuring compliance with the requirements of this  document.  Within a project, the lines of responsibility for fracture control activities can be  complex.  Responsibilities may involve both the line and project organizations.  Definitions for  the various organizations involved are given in section 3.2.  Generally, the line organization is  responsible for overseeing the technical adequacy of a given program/project; and the project  organization is responsible for implementing a technically adequate fracture control program on  its hardware.    The Fracture Control Coordinator (FCC) and the System Safety and Mission Assurance (SSMA)  representative shall assure that the fracture control activity is properly implemented and expedite  the generation of the required documentation according to section 4.4 of this standard.  Fracture  control implementation shall be done with the oversight, advice, and approval of the RFCB.   Fracture control program responsibilities shall be identified at Project Formulation or  Project/System Requirements Review (P/SRR).  For effective fracture control implementation,  the group, organization, or person(s) need to be identified who have the following  responsibilities:     a. Fracture classification of parts.     b. Identification and specification of required NDE or any other special requirements on  fracture-critical parts.     c. Implementation of traceability and documentation showing adherence of hardware to  approved drawings, specifications, plans, and procedures.     d. Fracture mechanics and structural analyses.     e. Assessment of anomalies on fracture-critical parts and for decisions regarding  questions or issues relating to fracture control.     f. Compilation and configuration control of the fracture control and related structural  documentation for the lifetime of the hardware.       NASA-STD-5019     APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE—DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED     9 of 44   Designers and analysts should become familiar with fracture control requirements and conduct a  hardware assessment as delineated by the requirements in this document to establish the fracture  criticality of structural parts and components.  After a final list of fracture-critical parts is  determined, the required analyses, inspections, and other fracture control activities need to be  implemented and monitored to assure timely and proper completion.     Most of this standard is written for the personnel responsible for assembling the Fracture Control  Plan, analysis, and much of the final documentation.  The designers who design the hardware  and produce the drawings from which hardware is made also have an important responsibility in  fracture control.  In addition to good design practices, the following are encouraged:     a. Design parts with redundancy.  Avoid single-point catastrophic failures in joints and  structures when it is reasonable to do so.     b. Design parts for inspectability.  Avoid welds that are not inspectable on all sides.     c. Avoid processes that tend to be crack prone such as welding, custom forging, and  casting.     d. Use well-characterized, standard aerospace materials for which the strength, fatigue,  and fracture properties are known, or provide for adequate material testing.  Material testing may  also be warranted for standard materials if they are to be used in unique applications.
60 1.1 Purpose    This standard establishes National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA)  program requirements for evaluation, testing, and selection of materials to preclude unsafe  conditions related to flammability, offgassing, and fluid compatibility.  Additional  materials performance requirements may be specified in other program or NASA Center- specific documentation.    1.2 Applicability    1.2.1 Materials intended for use in space vehicles, specified test facilities, and specified  Ground Support Equipment (GSE) shall meet the requirements of this document.     1.2.2  Responsible NASA Centers’ materials and processes (M&P) organizations shall  include applicable requirements of this document in their materials control programs.    This standard may be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a  technical requirement.  Requirements are indicated by the word “shall.” Explanatory or  guidance text is indicated in italics.    1.2.3 Tailoring of this standard for application to a specific program or project shall be  formally documented as part of program or project requirements and approved by the  Technical Authority.
60 This standard establishes uniform requirements for applying Data Matrix  identification symbols to parts used on NASA programs/projects using direct part marking  (DPM) methods and techniques. Overall program/project requirements related to the use of the  Data Matrix symbol include: symbol criteria, marking method selection, marking surface  preparation, marking location, protective coatings, and reading standards. This document  addresses the marking of human readable characters or temporary part identification markings  (bands, labels, or tags).  On new programs, human readable characters can be applied using  the same marking methods defined in this standard.  Data Matrix symbols can be added to parts  used on existing programs, provided there is adequate area to accommodate the mark and the  structural integrity of the part is not compromised.      1.2 Purpose.  This standard is intended to provide general requirements for applying  Data Matrix identification symbols safely onto products using permanent direct part marking  (DPM) methods and techniques.  The standard addresses symbol structure only as it relates to  marking and reading limitations.  Technical specifications related to the Data Matrix symbol are  found in AIM International, Inc. technical specification titled “International Symbology  Specification – Data Matrix. Technical information related to how to apply the markings is  addressed in NASA-HDBK-6003A, Application of Data Matrix Identification Symbols to  Aerospace Parts Using Direct Part Marking Methods/Techniques.       1.3 Applicability.  This standard recommends engineering practices for NASA programs  and projects.  It may be cited in contracts and program documents as a technical requirement or  as a reference for guidance.  Determining the suitability of this handbook and its provisions is  the responsibility of program/project management and the performing organization.  Individual  provisions of this standard may be tailored (i.e., modified or deleted) by contract or program  specifications to meet specific program/project needs and constraints.  Human readable  markings applied to NASA aircraft maintained under FAA certificate (e.g., Part 121, Part 135)  shall comply with the requirements of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations.     1.4 Environmental Stewardship.  Environmental, health and safety impacts in processes  and materials should be considered when employing identification marking methods and  techniques.  Alternative, "environmentally friendly", materials, which contain low/no volatile  organic compounds (VOCs), should be considered when determining the appropriate  method/technique for each marking application.  Many types of ink contain VOCs, such as  methyl ethyl ketone, xylene, and toluene, which are principal components in atmospheric  reactions that form ozone and other photochemical oxidants.  Exposures to VOC containing  materials have health impacts, which include eye and respiratory irritation, headache, dizziness,  memory impairment, neurotoxicity, cancer.
60 This standard and its related handbook, NASA-HDBK-6003, Application of Data Matrix  Identification Symbols to Aerospace Parts Using Direct Part Marking Methods/Techniques  (DPM), were developed to provide NASA and its contractors with instructions to safely apply  Data Matrix identification symbols to aerospace parts using these new DPM methods and  techniques.  Both the standard and the handbook were created by representatives from the major  automatic identification and data capture (AI/DC) manufacturers, Government, and aerospace  user groups under a collaborative agreement with NASA.  The standard has been approved by  NASA Headquarters for use by all field installations, and is intended to provide a common  framework for consistent practices across NASA programs.    Revision B of this standard includes updates stemming from the DoD/National Center of  Manufacturing Sciences (NCMS) Retrograde Part Marking Program as approved by the Assistant  Under Secretary of Defense, and the United States Coast Guard (USCG) Data Matrix Direct Part  Marking Flight Verification Program, which was sanctioned by the Flight Safety Critical Aircraft  Part Problem Action Team (FSCAP PAT) and the U.S. Congress Aircraft Safety Committee.   Revision B planning had called for the incorporation of information resulting from the Materials  International Space Station Experiment (MISSE), which exposed the Data Matrix Symbol  markings to low-earth orbit (LEO) environments.  However, due to delays in the retrieval of the  MISSE experiment, information related to marking processes certified for LEO are to be  incorporated into a later revision of this document.  MISSE program information is included in  Appendix A.       1.1 Purpose   This standard establishes uniform requirements for applying Data Matrix identification symbols  to parts used on NASA programs/projects using DPM methods and techniques.  Overall  program/project requirements related to the use of the Data Matrix symbol include symbol  criteria, marking method selection, marking surface preparation, marking location, protective  coatings, marking environments, and mark-quality verification standards.  This document does  not specifically address the marking of human-readable characters or temporary part  identification markings (bands, labels, or tags).  On new programs, human-readable characters  can be applied using the same marking methods defined in this standard.  Data Matrix symbols  can be added to parts used on existing programs if there is adequate area to accommodate the  mark and the structural integrity of the part is not compromised.     This standard is intended to provide general requirements for applying Data Matrix identification  symbols safely onto products using permanent DPM methods and techniques.  The standard  addresses symbol structure only as it relates to marking and reading limitations.  Technical  specifications related to the Data Matrix symbol are found in Automatic Identification  Manufacturers (AIM) International, Inc., technical specification titled “International Symbology     NASA-STD-6002B     8 of 68      Specification – Data Matrix.” Technical information on how to apply the markings is addressed  in NASA-HDBK-6003, Application of Data Matrix Identification Symbols to Aerospace Parts  Using Direct Part Marking Methods/Techniques.      1.2 Applicability   This standard is applicable to NASA programs/projects using DPM methods and techniques.    This standard may be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a technical  requirement.  Except where noted as mandatory, individual provisions of this standard may be  tailored (i.e., modified or deleted) by contract or program specifications to meet specific  program/project needs and constraints.  Tailoring must be formally documented and approved as  part of program/project requirements.    This standard explains the use of Data Matrix symbol marking to support updates to Automated  Identification Technology (AIT) systems used to provide program managers with real-time  hardware status.  The standard provides engineering practices for NASA programs and projects.   Human-readable markings applied to NASA aircraft maintained under Federal Aviation  Administration (FAA) certificate such as Part 121 or Part 135 shall comply with Title 14 of the  Code of Federal Regulations.  Data Matrix marking shall be used to identify all flight hardware  and ground support equipment, including, but not limited to the following:     ● Calibration items  ● Critical fasteners  ● EEE parts  ● Fracture-critical parts  ● Hazard analysis items  ● Items requiring periodic maintenance  ● Limited-life items  ● Pilferage items  ● Repair-limited items  ● Restricted-use items  ● Safety-critical Items  ● Temporary installations  ● Other items identified with paint dots or assigned date codes, lot numbers, member   numbers, or serial numbers for safety, reliability, maintainability or quality assurance  purposes, including items not currently serialized due to size limitations associated  with the applications of human-readable marking.
60 This standard and its related handbook, NASA-HDBK-6003, Application of Data Matrix  Identification Symbols to Aerospace Parts Using Direct Part Marking Methods/Techniques  (DPM), were developed to provide NASA and its contractors with instructions to safely apply  Data Matrix identification symbols to aerospace parts using these new DPM methods and  techniques.  Both the standard and the handbook were created by representatives from the major  automatic identification and data capture (AI/DC) manufacturers, Government, and aerospace  user groups under a collaborative agreement with NASA.  The standard has been approved by  NASA Headquarters for use by all field installations, and is intended to provide a common  framework for consistent practices across NASA programs.    Revision B of this standard included updates stemming from the Department of Defense  (DoD)/National Center of Manufacturing Sciences (NCMS) Retrograde Part Marking Program as  approved by the Assistant Under Secretary of Defense, and the United States Coast Guard  (USCG) Data Matrix Direct Part Marking Flight Verification Program, which was sanctioned by  the Flight Safety Critical Aircraft Part Problem Action Team (FSCAP PAT) and the U.S.  Congress Aircraft Safety Committee.  Revision B planning had called for the incorporation of  information resulting from the Materials International Space Station Experiment (MISSE), which  exposed the Data Matrix Symbol markings to low-earth orbit (LEO) environments.  However,  due to delays in the retrieval of the MISSE experiment, information related to marking processes  certified for LEO are to be incorporated into a later revision of this document.  MISSE program  information is included in Appendix A.       1.1 Purpose   This standard establishes uniform requirements for applying Data Matrix identification symbols  to parts used on NASA programs/projects using DPM methods and techniques.  Overall  program/project requirements related to the use of the Data Matrix symbol include symbol  criteria, marking method selection, marking surface preparation, marking location, protective  coatings, marking environments, and mark-quality verification standards.  This document does  not specifically address the marking of human-readable characters or temporary part  identification markings (bands, labels, or tags).  On new programs, human-readable characters  can be applied using the same marking methods defined in this standard.  Data Matrix symbols  can be added to parts used on existing programs if there is adequate area to accommodate the  mark and the structural integrity of the part is not compromised.     This standard is intended to provide general requirements for applying Data Matrix identification  symbols safely onto products using permanent DPM methods and techniques.  The standard  addresses symbol structure only as it relates to marking and reading limitations.  Technical     NASA-STD-6002D       APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE – DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED     13 of 74       specifications related to the Data Matrix symbol are found in Automatic Identification  Manufacturers (AIM) International, Inc., technical specification titled “International Symbology  Specification – Data Matrix.” Technical information on how to apply the markings is addressed  in NASA-HDBK-6003.     1.2 Applicability   This standard is applicable to NASA programs/projects using DPM methods and techniques.  In  all cases when identification is being applied to flight hardware, the responsible Technical  Authority shall approve the location of the mark and the method used to apply it.   This standard may be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a technical  requirement.  Mandatory requirements are indicated by the word “shall.”  Tailoring of this  standard for application to a specific program or project shall be approved by the Technical  Authority for that program or project.    This standard explains the use of Data Matrix symbol marking to support updates to Automated  Identification Technology (AIT) systems used to provide program managers with real-time  hardware status.  The standard provides engineering practices for NASA programs and projects.   Human-readable markings applied to NASA aircraft maintained under Federal Aviation  Administration (FAA) certificate such as Part 121 or Part 135 shall comply with Title 14 of the  Code of Federal Regulations.  Data Matrix marking shall be used to identify all flight hardware  and ground support equipment, including, but not limited to, the following:     ● Calibration items  ● Critical fasteners  ● Fracture-critical parts  ● Hazard analysis items  ● Items requiring periodic maintenance  ● Limited-life items  ● Pilferage items  ● Repair-limited items  ● Restricted-use items  ● Safety-critical Items  ● Temporary installations  ● Other items identified with paint dots or assigned date codes, lot numbers, member   numbers, or serial numbers (S/Is) for safety, reliability, maintainability, or quality  assurance purposes, including items not currently serialized due to size limitations  associated with the applications of human-readable marking.     This standard shall not be used for electrical, electronic, and electromechanical (EEE) parts  identification and marking requirements due to concerns relating to electrostatic discharge and  component degradation.  EEE part marking and identification are addressed in the military  standards for the specific part types.     NASA-STD-6002D       APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE – DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED     14 of 74
60 1.1 Purpose    This standard establishes fastener procurement, receiving inspection, and storage practices for all  fasteners used for spaceflight hardware that are procured, received, tested, inventoried, or  installed for space flight by a NASA Center, by a prime contractor, or by any other spaceflight  hardware developer.      1.1.1 For the purposes of this document, spaceflight hardware shall include any government- furnished equipment (GFE) or payloads that are flown on spaceflight vehicles.    1.2 Applicability      The requirements set forth in this document are the baseline fastener procurement, receiving  inspection, and storage requirements for all NASA spaceflight hardware.      This standard may be cited in contracts, program, and other Agency documents as a technical  requirement.  Requirements are numbered and indicated by the word “shall.”  Explanatory or  guidance text is indicated in italics beginning in section 4.    Individual NASA Centers may establish more restrictive program/project-specific requirements  and/or guidelines, as appropriate.  To do this, individual provisions of this standard may be  tailored (i.e., modified or deleted) by contract or program specifications to meet specific  constraints and program/project needs.      1.2.1 Deviations from this document or tailoring of this standard for application to a specific  program or project shall be formally documented as part of program or project requirements and  approved by the Technical Authority.
60 This document is directed toward Materials and Processes (M&P) used in the design, fabrication,  and testing of flight components for all NASA manned, unmanned, robotic, launch vehicle,  lander, in-space and surface systems, and spacecraft program/project hardware elements.  All  flight hardware is covered by the M&P requirements of this document, including vendor- designed, off- the-shelf, and vendor furnished items.  Materials and processes used in interfacing  ground support equipment (GSE); test equipment; hardware processing equipment; hardware  packaging; and hardware shipment shall be controlled to prevent damage to or contamination of  flight hardware.   1.1  Purpose     The purpose of this document is to define the minimum requirements for M&P and to provide a  general control specification for incorporation in NASA program/project hardware procurements  and technical programs   1.2   Applicability     The controls described here are applicable to all NASA spacecraft programs.  Programs shall  apply these controls to program/project hardware.  Programs, projects, and elements are  responsible for flowing requirements down to contractors, subcontractors, and the lowest  component-level suppliers.  Programs shall be responsible for demonstrating compliance with  these requirements.      These requirements may be tailored for specific programs/projects simply by constructing a  matrix of applicable paragraphs and paragraphs that are not applicable, subject to approval by the  responsible NASA M&P organization.  Tailoring also includes using existing or previously  developed contractor processes and standards as a submittal of the various required plans.   Otherwise, the tailoring of requirements may be documented in the Materials and Processes  Selection, Control, and Implementation Plan by providing the degree of conformance and the  method of implementation for each requirement identified here.      When a contractor Materials and Processes Selection, Control, and Implementation Plan has  been approved by the responsible program/project as an acceptable means of compliance with  the technical requirements of this document, the plan may be used for the implementation and  verification of M&P requirements on the applicable program/project.     NASA-STD-(I)-6016     This document represents the technical consensus of the  developing group but does not yet have final NASA approval.      8 of 56   This standard may be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a technical  requirement.  Mandatory requirements are indicated by the word “shall.”  Tailoring of this  standard for application to a specific program/project shall be approved by the Technical  Authority for that program/project.
00 1.1 Purpose    The purpose of this Interim Standard is to establish the format and content of two- dimensional (2D) drawings and three-dimensional (3D) models so that rework of these  products by collaborating organizations is minimized.  Adherence to this Interim  Standard will result in enhanced interoperability between organizations exchanging  Computer-Aided Design (CAD) products.    1.2 Applicability    This Interim Standard is applicable to all functions that generate or use 2D drawings and 3D  models (hereinafter called CAD products).  The need for this Interim Standard was identified  by the Constellation Program to support near-term milestones and is, therefore, centered  around the current CAD applications used throughout the Constellation Program.  This  Interim Standard, therefore, reflects the use of Parametric Technology Corporation’s (PTC’s)  Pro/ENGINEER Wildfire 3.0 as the application into which CAD products will be integrated.   The Interim Standard will be expanded at a later date to bring the benefit of interoperability to  the rest of the Agency by addressing the data exchange between other CAD applications in  more detail.    Some requirements in this Interim Standard are not specific to any CAD application.  In this  case, suppliers and recipients of CAD products are to adhere to these requirements in order to  benefit from improved interoperability.    This Interim Standard is approved for use by NASA Headquarters and NASA Centers,  including Component Facilities and Technical and Service Support Centers, and may be cited  in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a technical requirement.  This Interim  Standard may also apply to the Jet Propulsion Laboratory or to other contractors, grant  recipients, or parties to agreements only to the extent specified or referenced in their  contracts, grants, or agreements.    Requirements are indicated by the word “shall.”  Explanatory or guidance text is indicated in  italics beginning in section 4.  Rationale for requirements and guidance is provided in  Appendix A.       NASA-STD-(I)-0007   This document represents the technical consensus of the  developing group but does not yet have final NASA approval.         8 of 28   1.3 Tailoring    Tailoring of this Interim Standard for application to a specific program or project shall be  formally documented as part of program or project requirements and approved by the  Technical Authority.
50 1.1 Introduction   NASA’s policy is to produce flight systems with a high degree of reliability and safety.  This  is accomplished through good engineering practices in the design, analyses, inspections,  testing, fabrication, and operation of flight structures.  In keeping with this policy, all human- rated space systems shall be subjected to fracture control to preclude catastrophic failure.   Fracture control encompasses the consequences of naturally occurring and service-induced  flaws, damage, or cracks into a part or structure.  This document establishes the fracture  control requirements for all human-rated spaceflight systems including payloads, propulsion  systems, orbital support equipment, and planetary habitats.    A viable fracture control program relies on design, analysis, testing, non-destructive  evaluation, and tracking of fracture-critical hardware.  It is expected that all spaceflight  hardware will be manufactured consistent with aerospace standards, practices, and quality.  It  is beyond the scope, or intent, of this document to address technical or quality disciplines that  should already exist and be in place regardless of fracture control.  Fracture control is  imposed and required to enhance the safety and mission reliability of systems by reducing the  risk of catastrophic failure.    It is recommended that the fracture control practitioners become familiar with all portions of  this standard.  The requirements are contained in section 4.  Section 1.4 addresses  responsibilities in fracture control.  Applicable fracture control requirements documents are  provided in section 2.  Reference documents are provided in section 5.  Section 4.1 addresses  non-fracture-critical and fracture-critical hardware for generic and specific hardware items.   The methodology for assessing fracture-critical parts is provided in section 4.2, and tracking  for these parts is provided in section 4.3.  Section 4.4 provides documentation descriptions,  section 4.5 provides verification requirements, and section 4.6 provides alternative methods  for fracture control.  Section 4.7 provides other requirements.  An acronym list and  definitions are given in section 3.  NASA-HDBK-5010 provides useful guidance and  examples for meeting the fracture control requirements contained in this document.   1.2 Purpose  Fracture control is implemented to reduce the risk of a catastrophic failure from a defect or  damage.  The intent of this standard is to provide fracture control requirements for  spaceflight hardware.  A variety of fracture control considerations and options are addressed,  some of which may not be applicable to a given design.  Information is provided to assist the  user in the development of an effective Fracture Control Plan and other fracture control  documentation.     NASA-STD-(I)-5019     This document represents the technical consensus of the   developing group but does not yet have final NASA approval.     8 of 40   1.3 Applicability   These requirements are not imposed on systems other than human-rated spaceflight but may  be tailored for use in specific cases where it is prudent to do so, such as when national assets  are at risk.  This standard may be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as  a technical requirement.  Mandatory requirements are indicated by the word “shall.”   1.4 Responsibilities  The lines of responsibility for fracture control activities can be complex.  Responsibilities  may involve both the line and project organizations.  Definitions for the various  organizations involved are given in section 3.2.  Generally, the line organization is  responsible for overseeing the technical adequacy of a given program/project; and the project  organization is responsible for implementing a technically adequate fracture control program  on its hardware.    The Responsible Program Authority (RPA), in conjunction with the Fracture Control  Coordinator (FCC) and the System Safety and Mission Assurance (SSMA) representative,  shall assure that the fracture control activity is properly implemented and shall expedite the  generation of the required documentation according to section 4.4 of this standard.  This shall  be done with the oversight, advice, and approval of the Responsible Fracture Control  Authority (RFCA).  Fracture control program responsibilities shall be identified prior to the  Phase I Safety Review or the Preliminary Design Review (PDR).  For effective fracture  control implementation, the group, organization, or person(s) need to be identified who have  the following responsibilities:     a. Fracture classification of parts.  b. Identification and specification of required nondestructive evaluation (NDE)   inspections or any other special requirements on fracture-critical parts.  c. Implementation of traceability and documentation showing adherence of   hardware to approved drawings, specifications, plans, and procedures.  d. Fracture mechanics and structural analyses.  e. Assessment of anomalies on fracture-critical parts and for decisions regarding   questions or issues relating to fracture control.  f. Compilation and configuration control of the fracture control and related   structural documentation for the lifetime of the hardware.    Designers and analysts should become familiar with fracture control requirements and  conduct a hardware assessment as delineated by the requirements in this document to  establish the fracture criticality of structural parts and components.  After a final list of  fracture-critical parts is determined, the required analyses, inspections, and other fracture  control activity need to be implemented and monitored to assure timely and proper  completion.     Most of this standard is written for the personnel responsible for assembling the fracture  control plan, analysis, and much of the final documentation.  The designers who design the     NASA-STD-(I)-5019     This document represents the technical consensus of the   developing group but does not yet have final NASA approval.     9 of 40   hardware and produce the drawings from which hardware is made also have an important  responsibility in fracture control.  In addition to good design practices, the following are  encouraged:     a. Design parts with redundancy.  Avoid single-point failures in joints and structures  when it is reasonable to do so.   b. Design parts for inspectability.  Avoid welds that are not inspectable from both  sides.   c. Avoid processes that tend to be crack prone such as welding, custom forging, and  casting.   d. Use well-characterized, standard aerospace materials for which the strength,  fatigue, and fracture properties are known, or provide for adequate material testing.
60 1.1 Purpose    This standard establishes fastener management and control policy, responsibilities, and practices  for all fasteners used for space flight hardware and ground support equipment (GSE) that are  procured, received, tested, inventoried, or installed for space flight by a NASA Center, prime  contractors, or hardware developers.   1.2 Applicability      The requirements set forth in this document are the minimum fastener management and control  requirements for all space flight hardware and GSE.  Any deviations from these requirements  shall be approved by the governing program/project.      This standard may be cited in contracts and program documents as a technical requirement or as  a reference for guidance.  Determining the suitability of this standard and its provisions is the  responsibility of the program/project management and the performing organization.  For  fasteners that are deemed not to be fracture critical, single point fracture, mission critical, or fail  safe, the individual provisions of this standard may be tailored (i.e., modified or deleted) by  contract or program specifications to meet specific program/project needs and constraints.    Individual NASA Centers may establish more restrictive, project-specific requirements and/or  guidelines as appropriate.  These additional requirements/guidelines shall be approved by the  responsible program authority.         NASA-STD-(I)-6008       This document represents the technical consensus of the    developing group but does not yet have final NASA approval.     7 of 22
60 This document is directed toward materials and processes (M&P) used in the design, fabrication,  and testing of flight components for all NASA manned, unmanned, robotic, launch vehicle,  lander, in-space and surface systems, and spacecraft program/project hardware elements.  All  flight hardware is covered by the M&P requirements of this document, including vendor- designed, off-the-shelf, and vendor-furnished items.      M&P used in interfacing ground support equipment (GSE), test equipment, hardware processing  equipment, hardware packaging, and hardware shipment shall be controlled to prevent damage to  or contamination of flight hardware.   1.1  Purpose     The purpose of this document is to define the minimum requirements for M&P and to provide a  general control specification for incorporation in NASA program/project hardware procurements  and technical programs.    1.2 Applicability     The controls described here are applicable to all NASA spacecraft programs.       a. Programs shall apply these controls to program/project hardware.  Programs, projects,  and elements are responsible for flowing requirements down to contractors, subcontractors, and  the lowest component-level suppliers.       b. Programs shall be responsible for demonstrating compliance with these requirements.       These requirements may be tailored for specific programs/projects simply by constructing a  matrix of applicable paragraphs and paragraphs that are not applicable, subject to approval by the  responsible program/project NASA M&P organization, the responsible program/project, and the  responsible Technical Authority.  Tailoring also includes using existing or previously developed  contractor processes and standards as a submittal of the various required plans.  Otherwise, the  tailoring of requirements may be documented in the Materials and Processes Selection, Control,  and Implementation Plan by providing the degree of conformance and the method of  implementation for each requirement identified here.       NASA-STD-6016       NOTE:  Per section 4.1.3:  The use of M&P that do not comply with the technical requirements of this standard may be acceptable in the actual  hardware applications.  MUAs shall be submitted for all M&P that are technically acceptable but do not meet the technical requirements of this  standard, as implemented by the approved Materials and Processes Selection, Control, and Implementation Plan.     APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE – DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED     8 of 67      c. Tailoring of requirements in the Materials and Processes Selection, Control, and  Implementation Plan shall be approved by the responsible program/project NASA M&P  organization, the responsible project/program, and the responsible Technical Authority.  When a  contractor Materials and Processes Selection, Control, and Implementation Plan has been  approved by the responsible program/project as an acceptable means of compliance with the  technical requirements of this document, the plan may be used for the implementation and  verification of M&P requirements on the applicable program/project.    This standard may be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a technical  requirement.  Requirements are indicated by the word “shall”; explanatory/guidance text is  indicated in italics in section 4.
70 1.1  Purpose    This standard was developed in response to Action 4 from the 2004 report “A Renewed  Commitment to Excellence,” which stated the following:    “Develop a standard for the development, documentation, and operation of models and  simulations   a. Identify best practices to ensure that knowledge of operations is captured in the user  interfaces (e.g., users are not able to enter parameters that are out of bounds),   b. Develop process for tool verification and validation, certification, reverification,  revalidation, and recertification based on operational data and trending,   c. Develop standard for documentation, configuration management, and quality  assurance,   d. Identify any training or certification requirements to ensure proper operational  capabilities,   e. Provide a plan for tool management, maintenance, and obsolescence consistent with  modeling/simulation environments and the aging or changing of the modeled  platform or system,   f. Develop a process for user feedback when results appear unrealistic or defy  explanation.”     Subsequently, in 2006, the NASA Chief Engineer provided the following further guidance:     g. “Include a standard method to assess the credibility of the models and simulations  presented to the decision maker when making critical decisions (i.e., decisions that  effect human safety or mission success) using results from models and simulations,   h. Assure that the credibility of models and simulations meet the project requirements.”     Each of the requirements and recommendations in this standard can be traced to one or more of  the eight objectives listed above.  The traceability matrix of the requirements in this standard to  the eight objectives can be found online upon accessing this standard at URL  http://standards.nasa.gov; refer to “Requirements Traceability Matrix.”  Some of these objectives  are met by recommendations rather than by requirements as a result of either (a) the practical  impossibility of satisfying the requirement in all cases, or (b) further guidance received from  NASA Headquarters.       NASA-STD-7009        APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE — DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED  8 of 58   These eight objectives are encapsulated in the overall goal for this standard, which is to ensure  that the credibility of the results from M&S is properly conveyed to those making critical  decisions.  Critical decisions based on M&S results, as defined by this standard, are those  technical decisions related to design, development, manufacturing, ground, or flight operations  that may impact human safety or program/project-defined mission success criteria.  The intent is  to reduce the risks associated with critical decisions.  This standard covers the development and  operation (or execution) of M&S as well as the processes of analysis and presentation of the  results from the M&S.    This standard addresses aspects of M&S that are common across NASA activities.  Discipline- specific details of M&S should be addressed in future documents, such as Recommended  Practices (usually entitled “Handbooks” in the NASA document hierarchy), and are not included  in this standard.     The scope of this standard covers the development and maintenance of models, the operation of  simulations, the analysis of the results, training, recommended practices, the assessment of the  M&S credibility, and the reporting of the M&S results.  Some of the key features of this standard  are requirements and recommendations for verification, validation, uncertainty quantification,  training, credibility assessment, and reporting to decision makers; also included are the cross- cutting areas of documentation and configuration management (CM).    The requirements/recommendations in sections 4.7 and 4.8 are the culmination of the standard.   The requirements/recommendations in sections 4.1 – 4.6 are intended to support the  requirements in sections 4.7 and 4.8.  This is accomplished by ensuring that sufficient details of  the M&S process along with intermediate results are available to support the requirements in  sections 4.7 and 4.8 and to respond to in-depth queries by the decision maker.  Appendix A  provides guidance for assessing the risk of using M&S in engineering decisions.  Appendix B  provides details related to some of the requirements/recommendations in sections 4.7 and 4.8.   Appendix C contains a template for a compliance matrix.    1.2 Applicability    This standard applies to M&S used by NASA and its contractors for critical decisions in design,  development, manufacturing, ground operations, and flight operations.  (Guidance for  determining which particular M&S are in scope is provided in section 4.1 and Appendix A.)   This standard also applies to use of legacy as well as commercial-off-the-shelf (COTS),  government-off-the-shelf (GOTS), and modified-off-the-shelf (MOTS) M&S to support critical  decisions.  Generally, for such M&S, particular attention may need to be paid to defining the  limits of operation and to verification, validation, and uncertainty quantification.  Programs and  projects are encouraged to apply this standard to M&S, if the M&S results may impact future  critical decisions.   This standard does not apply to M&S that are embedded in control software, emulation software,  and stimulation environments.  However, Center implementation plans for NPR 7150.2, NASA  Software Engineering Requirements, should specifically cover embedded M&S, and address     NASA-STD-7009        APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE — DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED  9 of 58   such M&S-specific issues as numerical accuracy, uncertainty analysis, sensitivity analysis, M&S  verification, and M&S validation.    This standard may be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a technical  requirement.  Requirements are indicated by the word “shall”; explanatory or guidance text is  indicated in italics.      1.2.1 Tailoring for application to a specific program or project shall be formally documented as  part of program or project requirements and approved by the Technical Authority.      1.3 Focus    In general, standards may focus on engineering/technical requirements, processes, procedures,  practices, or methods.  This standard focuses on requirements and recommendations.  Hence, this  standard specifies what shall or should be done; it does not prescribe how the requirements are to  be met, nor does it specify who is the responsible party for complying with the requirements.
40 This standard and information handbook presents an overview of the current  understanding of the various plasma interactions that can result when a high voltage  system is operated in the Earth’s ionosphere, references common design practices that  have exacerbated plasma interactions in the past, and recommends standard practices to  eliminate or mitigate such reactions.   1.1 Purpose   The purpose of this standard is to provide a design standard for high-voltage space power  systems (>55 volts) that operate in the plasma environment associated with LEO (altitude  from 200 and 1000 km and latitude between -50 and +50 degrees).  Such power systems,  particularly solar arrays, are the proximate cause of spacecraft charging in LEO and these  systems can interact with this environment in a number of ways that are potentially  destructive to themselves as well as to the platform or vehicle that has deployed them.    High voltage systems are used in space for two reasons.  The first reason is  to save  launch weight.  First of all, for the same power level, higher voltages enable use of  thinner wires (lighter cabling).  This is true because P = IV, and V = IR, so P = I2R  (where P is power, I is current, R is resistance, and V is voltage).  If I is decreased by use  of higher V, then thinner wires can be used with no increase in power loss due to cabling.   Of course, if one uses the same cable mass, higher voltages will enable higher  efficiencies, since less power will be lost to resistance in the cables.  For very large power  systems, the decrease in cable mass can be substantial.    Second, some spacecraft functions require high voltages.  For example, electric  propulsion uses voltages from about 300 V (Hall thrusters) to about 1000 V (ion  thrusters).  For low voltage power systems, conversion of substantial power to high  voltages is required for these spacecraft functions to operate.  The weight of the power  conversion systems, power management and distribution (PMAD), can be a substantial  fraction of the total power system weight in these cases.  It is more efficient, and can save  weight, if the high voltage functions can be directly powered from a high voltage solar  array, for instance.  If the high voltage function is electric propulsion, we call such a  system a direct-drive electric propulsion system.      Because of these and other reasons for using high voltages in space, spacecraft designers  and manufacturers are using high voltages more and more.  However, the use of high  voltages entails risk; in particular, spacecraft charging in LEO, in contrast to that in  geosynchronous earth orbit (GEO), is caused by exposed high voltages, and can lead  to arcing, power drains, power disruptions, and loss of spacecraft coatings.  Thus, system     NASA-STD-(I)-4005       This document represents the technical consensus of the    Developing group but does not yet have final NASA approval.      7 of 82   designers need a standard to show them how to mitigate the spacecraft charging effects of  using high voltages in LEO.  In addition to system designers, this document should be  useful to project managers, solar array designers, system engineers, etc.    This document is intended as a standard for design applications and can be used as a  requirements specification instrument.    1.2 Applicability    This standard is applicable to high-voltage space power systems that operate in the plasma  environment associated with LEO.      This standard is intended for space systems that spend the majority of their time at  altitudes between 200 and 1000 km (usually known as LEO applications) and at latitudes  between about + and – 50 degrees — that is, space systems that do not encounter GEO  (geosynchronous orbit) charging conditions, that do not (often) encounter the auroral  ovals of electron streams, and that do not fly through the Van Allen belts.  For the  extreme radiation protection that is necessary for orbits in the Van Allen belts,  exterior spacecraft charging will likely be a secondary concern.  However, internal  charging will be very important.  It is not in the purview of this document to deal with  internal charging.    Some of the design standards for LEO are at variance with good design practice for GEO  spacecraft.  If your spacecraft will fly in both LEO and GEO conditions, be careful to use  design solutions that are applicable in both environmental regimes.   This standard may be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a  technical requirement.  Mandatory requirements are indicated by the word “shall.”   Tailoring of this standard for application to a specific program/project shall be approved  by the Technical Authority for that program/project.     NASA-STD-(I)-4005       This document represents the technical consensus of the    Developing group but does not yet have final NASA approval.      8 of 82
50 1.1 Purpose   The purpose of this standard is to establish structural strength design and test factors, as well  as service life factors to be used for spaceflight hardware development and verification.  It is  intended to reduce space project costs and schedules by enhancing the commonalty of use of  hardware designs between NASA flight projects, Centers, and their contractors.  While it is  true that structural designs are sometimes governed by criteria other than strength, the criteria  in this document are to be considered as minimum acceptable values unless adequate  engineering risk assessment is provided which justifies the use of lower values.    1.2 Applicability   This standard recommends engineering practices for NASA programs and projects.  It may  be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a technical requirement or as a  reference for guidance.  Except where noted as mandatory, individual provisions of this  standard may be tailored (i.e., modified or deleted) by contract or program specifications to  meet specific program/project needs and constraints.  Tailoring must be formally documented  as part of program/project requirements and approved by the assigned Technical Authority.    Determining the suitability of this standard and its provisions is the responsibility of  program/project management and the performing organization.  Project-specific tailoring  may generate other project specific requirements that are derivatives of this standard.  NASA  Programs and projects that do not meet the provisions of this document shall be assessed by  the NASA Program Manager for the associated risk to the success of the planned NASA  mission and approved by the assigned Technical Authority.  This document shall not  supersede applicable laws and regulations unless a specific exemption has been obtained.    The criteria in this standard are applicable to launch vehicles, including their propellant tanks  and solid rocket motor cases, and payloads.  These criteria apply to flight hardware which is  utilized for NASA missions.  The standard presents acceptable minimum factors of safety for  use in analytical assessment and test verification of structural adequacy of the flight  hardware.  Designs must generally be verified by both structural strength analyses and tests.   The factors are to be multiplied by the limit stresses (including additive thermal stresses), and  the products must be verified not to exceed material allowable stresses (yield and ultimate)  under the expected temperatures and other operating conditions.    Criteria are specified for design and test of flight articles where the actual flight hardware is  tested (protoflight), and where qualification tests are conducted on a separate (prototype)  article.  In general, no distinction is made between “manned” and “unmanned” missions.   Structures of manned flight systems may be subjected to additional verification and/or safety     NASA-STD-(I)-5001A     This document represents the technical consensus of the  developing group but does not yet have final NASA approval.     10 of 20   requirements (e.g., fracture control) that are consistent with the established risk levels for  mission success and flight crew safety.   The requirements specifically excluded from this standard are design loads determination,  fracture control, engines, rotating hardware, solid propellant, insulation, ground support  equipment, and facilities.  Also excluded are specific configuration factors, such as fitting  factors, buckling knockdown factors, and load uncertainty factors.   1.3 Constraints and Preconditions   The criteria of this standard were developed in the context of structural and mechanical  systems designs which are amenable to engineering analyses by current state-of-the-art  methods and conforming to standard aerospace industry practices.  More specifically, the  designs are assumed to use materials having mechanical properties that are well characterized  for the intended service environments and all design conditions.  For reusable and multi- mission hardware, these criteria are applicable throughout the design service life and all of  the missions.  Therefore, design considerations must include material property degradation  under the service environments.  Material allowables shall be chosen to minimize the  probability of structural failure due to material variability.  Allowables shall be based on  sufficient material tests to establish values on a statistical basis.  Further, the service  environments and limit loads shall be well defined, and aerospace standard manufacturing  and process controls shall be used in the hardware fabrication and handling.  Test hardware  shall be representative of the flight configuration.
50 1.1 Purpose    This interim standard establishes top-level requirements and guidance for design and fabrication  of ground support equipment (GSE) to assist NASA space flight programs/projects in providing  robust, safe, reliable, maintainable, supportable, and cost-effective GSE.    1.2 Applicability    The application of this standard to NASA space flight programs is at the discretion of the  program.  This standard recommends a set of GSE design requirements for NASA programs and  projects.  The requirements described here are applicable to all NASA space flight programs that  process space flight pedigree hardware using GSE.      This standard may be cited in contracts, program, and other Agency documents as a technical  requirement.  Mandatory requirements are indicated by the word “shall”; italicized text indicates  explanatory or guidance text.  These requirements may be tailored for specific programs/projects  by documenting the proposed changes/tailoring; tailored requirements shall be approved by the  Technical Authority for the program or project.  Tailoring also includes using existing or  previously developed contractor processes and standards as a submittal of the various required  plans.     Programs, projects, and elements are responsible for flowing requirements down to contractors,  subcontractors, and suppliers of components at the lowest level.  Program contractors may elect  to manufacture deliverable GSE to flight hardware requirements if using flight hardware  requirements represents an overall cost savings.    Along with identifying this standard for design and development of GSE, Programs, in  conjunction with Engineering and S&MA organizations, have the responsibility to provide the  following:      a. Determining categories or types (e.g., critical vs. non-critical) of GSE and any  additional requirements resulting from these categories or types;     b. Establishing and defining where this standard will be applied when such boundaries  require clarification;    c. Establishing program and project-specific requirements; and     NASA-STD-(I)-5005C       APPROVED FOR PUBLIC RELEASE—DISTRIBUTION IS UNLIMITED     This document represents the technical consensus of the   developing group but does not yet have final NASA approval.     14 of 82    d. Establishing minimum configuration management systems to retain the required  documentation.   This standard does not apply to the following:     a. Equipment that is used during the manufacturing of flight hardware;    b. Ground support systems (GSS) that interface with GSE; and     c. Facilities.   1.3 Intended Use    This interim standard is intended for use in establishing uniform engineering practices and  methods and ensuring that essential requirements are included in the design and fabrication of  GSE used to support the operations of receiving, transportation, handling, assembly, inspection,  test, checkout, service, launch, and recovery of space vehicles and payloads at NASA’s launch,  landing, or retrieval locations.
50 1.1 Purpose   The purpose of this standard is to establish the nondestructive evaluation (NDE)  requirements for fracture control of all aerospace flight systems including manned and  unmanned spaceflight systems, manned and unmanned aeronautical systems, payloads,  flight experiments and associated ground based hardware.  This standard defines the  primary requirements for NDE in support of NASA-STD-5007, General Fracture Control  Requirements for Manned Spaceflight Systems.  NDE applied in-process for purposes of  process control is not addressed in this document.    It is the policy of NASA to produce aerospace flight systems with a high degree of  reliability and safety.  This is accomplished through good design; manufacturing; test and  operational practices, including the judicious choice of materials, detailed analysis,  appropriate factors of safety, rigorous testing and control of hardware, and reliable  inspection.  NASA fracture control requirements stipulate that all aerospace flight  systems be subjected to fracture control procedures to preclude catastrophic failure.   Those procedures frequently rely on NDE to ensure that significant crack-like flaws are  not present in critical areas.  NDE processes shall meet the requirements in this standard  to screen hardware reliably for the presence of crack-like flaws.      Nothing in this document shall be construed as requiring duplication of effort dictated by  other contract provisions.  Conversely, provisions stated herein shall not be interpreted to  preclude compliance with requirements invoked by other provisions.      1.2 Applicability   This standard is applicable to the fracture control of metal components, e.g. aluminum, steel,  titanium, and nickel alloys for all aerospace flight systems including manned and unmanned  spaceflight systems, manned and unmanned aeronautical systems, payloads, flight experiments  and associated ground based hardware.  Conditional notes on applicability are presented in  section 4.2.3.     NASA-STD-(I)-5009       This document represents the technical consensus of the    developing group but does not yet have final NASA approval.     7 of 30   The requirements described herein shall apply to fracture-critical hardware developed for NASA  by NASA Centers, international partners, contractors, and outside organizations.   This standard may be cited in contract, program, and other Agency documents as a  technical requirement.  Mandatory requirements are indicated by the word “shall.”   Tailoring of this standard for application to a specific program/project shall be approved  by the Technical Authority for that program/project.